1999 Annual Repor t on School Safety Archived Information School 1999 Annual Repor t on School Safety School A joint report prepared by the U.S. Department of Education and the U.S. Department of Justice
ii
Table of Contents
iv 1
Introduction Chapter 1 The Nature and Scope of School Violence A National Perspective An International Perspective Harassment and Hate Crime
11
Chapter 2 Safe Schools/Healthy Students--Collaboration In Action Urban Sites Suburban Sites Rural Sites Tribal Sites
31
Chapter 3 Model Programs Violence Prevention Programs Substance Use Prevention Programs Problem Behavior Prevention Programs
51
Chapter 4 Resources Federal Resources Online Federal Documents Organizations Websites
62
References
iii
Introduction
Th e vast ma jorit y of Ameri ca's sch ools are safe places.
In fact, n otwi thstan di ng t he disturbing report s o f vi olence i n our sch ools, t he y a re becoming even safer.
But t he f ear s of students, teache rs and pa ren ts are rea l.
An d it is t ru e th at some sch ools h ave se riou s cri me and v iolence problems.
Th e A nnu al Report on School Safety is a guide for use in combati ng t he se f ea rs a nd pr ob lems.
Th e 1999 e dit ion o f th e Annua l R epor t is designed t o compleme nt its pr edecessor.
It pre sen ts an u pdate d description of t he natur e a nd ext ent of cri me a nd v io len ce on school pro p e rt y.
It shows wha t measure s some schools have t aken t o p reve nt and ad dre ss sch ool violence, r efining and re visi ng the p rogram informa tion p rovided last year.
And it captu re s th e spi rit of 54 communit ies ar ound th e countr y that have ta ken to hear t one ch ap ter in p ar ticular from la st year's Annual Re por t, enti tled What C ommunities Can Do Through Collaboration.
Th is An nual Repor t is divided into four cha pters: The N at ure and Scope of Schoo l Violence; Safe Schoo ls/He al thy Stude nt s--Collab orat io n in A ction; Model Programs; an d Re sour ces.
C ha pt er 1 pre sen ts t he n ature a nd scope of school vio lence in t he U nit ed Sta tes a nd ab ro ad .
The national perspective on school crime and saf et y issues e xamines data on homicides and sui cides a t sc ho ol, injurie s at scho ol, cr imes a gainst students, crimes again st tea chers, wea pons at sch ool, t he con sequences of bringi ng fir earms to scho ol, an d stude nt pe rcep ti on s of scho ol safet y. More detai led pre sen ta tion s o f th ese a nd o th er rela ted n atio na l data can be f ound in t he I nd icat ors of S chool Crime a nd Safet y,1999 by the National Center for Education Stat isti cs a nd th e Bure au of Ju sti ce St ati stics (see Re fe ren ces).
This yea r, Ch ap ter 1 also in cludes both a n in ter na ti onal pe rspec tiv e on schoo l vio le nce , c omparing data across a numb er of dif feren t countri es on feelings of safety, b ully in g an d stu de nt be ha vior, a s we ll as a discussion of hate cri me and h ar assme nt legisla tion and re lated statistics.
iv
C ha pte r 2 high lig ht s 54 communiti es that are putting into practice the colla borative, problem-solv ing model fe ature d in the secon d c ha pte r of last y ear's Annual Report .
The President rece nt ly announced that these communit ies would r eceive grants under t he brand n ew Safe Sch ools/H ea lthy Stud en ts Initi ati ve.
The I ni tiative promotes comprehensive strateg ie s that p rovid e st udents, schoo ls, and commun iti es t he b en efit of en ha nced educat ional, mental healt h, socia l ser vice, la w enf or cement, a nd , a s appropria te, juvenile justice sy stem ser vices.
Th e Annual Re por t w ill t rack th e progress of th ese communiti es in ye ars to come .
Cha pte r 3 prese nt s summar y info rmat ion on school violence preven ti on and relate d programs t ha t work-- prog rams that are well design ed , have demon st rated ef fective ne ss, and ca n be imp lemente d as p ar t of a c omprehensive sch ool sa fe ty plan.
The programs in clude d in th is cha pte r a re in tende d to complement, not re pla ce, th ose p rograms d escri be d i n last ye ar's Annual Repor t .
No t surpri singly, some of the pro grams are the same , but a y ea r's wor t h of additional learn i ng has allowed the ide nt ifica tion o f new, ef fect ive pr ograms.
C ha pte r 4 li sts resources for mo re in forma ti on a bout school safety and crime i ssue s.
The se resources in clude or ganizations, Web sites, listser ves, v ide os, Fed era l resource s, an d p ublications.
Throughout t he Ann ual Rep or t, school profiles focus on several schools th at are doi ng a n ex emp lar y job of creating and main taining safe e nv iron men ts.
The se scho ols wer e i dentified through a competitiv e p rocess by th e U.S. Dep ar tment of Education's R ecog ni tion Program.
One school, Gonzalo Garz a I nd ep enden ce High S chool, is included as a mod el a lternative scho ol providin g pe rsona lize d ser v ices for at-risk students.
v
The Nature and Scope of School Violence CHAPTER 1
The recent school sho oting s h av e drawn heightened public a tte nt ion to school crime an d safety.
U nfo rtunately, p ublic perceptions of scho ol safety are of te n fu ele d b y media a ccounts that p lay up tragic events a nd fai l t o provide a rea l un de rstandi ng of t he accomplishments of schoo ls or th e p ro blems they fa ce.
The h ei gh te ne d public a tt en tio n d oes p ro vide an op p or tun it y t o c lose ly e xam in e w ha t i s h ap pe ning in sch ools today.
A s we learn more , we ca n use that knowledg e to fashion ra tional policie s a nd strate gi es for preventing crime and in creasin g school saf et y.
A ssessing t he sa fe ty of our sch ools, on both nat ional and inter na tion al leve ls, is a comple x under taki ng .
This repor t bring s toge th er, in one do cu men t, c riti cal i nf or mati on gleaned from nume ro us sur ve ys and r eport s. Wh il e we do no t know as much abo ut threats t o sch ool safety as we migh t like, t hi s docume nt is a sta rt in g point f r om which an initi al asse ssment of sc hool saf et y emerg es.
A s more sch ools an d ju ri sdictions colle ct data on school crime and saf ety issues, we will be able to eliminat e inf ormation gaps.
Re ad ers should note that th is r epor t speci fically ad dre sses i ntention al injuries and crimes a gainst stude nt s an d tea che rs.
A small amou nt of infor mati on on unintentional injuries and acci de nt s is pre sented a s well.
1999 ANNUA L REPORT ON SCH OOL SAFE TY
1
The first section of this chapter presents national data on school crime and youth violence.
Data on international school crime and youth violence follow.
The chapter concludes with information on hate crime and harassment.
Data used in this chapter are drawn from several different studies conducted by the Bureau of Justice Statistics, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the National Center for Education Statistics, the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development, and the Survey Research Center of the University of Michigan.
A complete list of the studies is included in the References section of this report.
All the studies used nationally representative samples, except for the data source on school-associated violent deaths (which tracked all school-associated violent deaths in the country), and the data source for unintentional injuries (which used the school National Pediatric Trauma Registry to identify cases from 74 hospitals in 30 states).
Data sources for the other studies varied.
Some surveyed different populations of students, another surveyed teachers, and yet another surveyed other school staff.
Definitions of crime, age groups analyzed, and time periods can vary from indicator to indicator.
The reader should also note that definitions vary across studies.
For example,
"at school" and "away from school" may have different meanings, depending upon the study.
For a more complete understanding of most of the data in this report, see Indicators of School Crime and Safety, 1999, or the original studies listed in the References section.
A N AT I O N A L P E RS P E C T I V E
Building on data provided in the 1998 Annual Report on School Safety, this section provides a national picture of American schools and the amount of violence and crime experienced by those who work and learn there.
Where possible, data are presented that update the 1998 Annual Report, so that progress in combating school violence may be tracked and analyzed.
Several data sources have been added to this year's Annual Report.
Figures with the icon have been updated from last year's Annual Report.
This section attempts to address those questions at the heart of the school safety issue.
Are most injuries that occur at school the result of violence? How much crime is occurring in our Nation's schools? Are schools more or less safe than in the past? Do students feel safe at school? What kinds of crimes are occurring? How likely is it that students or teachers will become the victims of school crime? After a relatively quiet 1998-99 school year, we were subjected to a rude and tragic awakening after the shootings at Columbine High School.
We were reminded once again that while homicides at school are extremely rare events, they do occur and they affect the perspective of all Americans, especially school children.
H omic i de s a t s choo l r em ain e xt re me ly ra re ev ent s.
While multiple homicide events have captured headlines in recent years, there still exists a less than one in a million chance of suffering a school-associated violent death, but even that is too much.
· Preliminary data indicate that less than one percent of the more than 2,500 children nationwide who were murdered or committed suicide in the first half of the 1997-1998 school year (July 1, 1997 ­ December 31, 1997) were at school (on school property, at a school sponsored event, or on the way to or from school or a school sponsored event).
· For the complete school year, July 1, 1997 through June 30, 1998, there were 58 school-associated violent deaths (student and non-students) that resulted from 46 incidents.
Forty-six of these violent deaths were homicides, 11 were suicides, and one teenager was killed by a law enforcement officer in the course of duty.
2
1 999
ANNU AL
RE PORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
· Among the homicide deaths, 29 were single homicides, 14 were homicides in events with multiple victims, and three were part of a combination homicide/suicide.
Among the homicide victims, 30 (65 percent) were male.
Also, 34 (74 percent) were school aged children, six (13 percent) were school staff, and six (13 percent) were not affiliated with any school.
· Thirty-two (70 percent) of the homicides at school occurred on school property, one (2 percent) occurred at a school sponsored event, and 13 (28 percent) occurred in transit to or from school or a school sponsored event.
· Of the suicide deaths, eight were single suicides, and three were part of a combination homicide/suicide.
Among the suicide victims, 10 (91 percent) were male, six (55 percent) were school aged children, one (9 percent) was school staff , and four (36 percent) were not affiliated with any school.
· Nine (82 percent) of the suicides occurred on school property.
Two (18 percent) occurred in transit to or from school or at a school sponsored event.
Th e n u mb er o f mu lt ip le v ict im h o mici d e e ve nts at sch ool ha s in cr eased.
Although there were fewer school-associated violent death incidents in the 1997-98 school year (46 total) than in 1992-93 (55 total), the total number of multiple victim homicide events appears to have increased (see figure 1).
Multiple victim homicides include events where an offender fatally injured more than one victim.
Combination homicide/suicides and multiple suicides are excluded from this count.
· Since the 1992-93 school multiple victim homicide 1993-1994 school year). events in 1992-93 to five year, there has been at least one event each year (except for the The number increased from two events in 1997-98.
D e spi te r ece nt o cc ur re nce s, s cho o ls s houl d n o t be si ng le d ou t as e s pe ci a ll y da ng e ro us pl a ce s i n the co mmun ity. Mo st s choo l c rim e i s th ef t , no t seri ou s vi ole nt c ri me .
The nature of crime away from school is far more serious than at school.
Thankfully, serious violent crime rates (as well as theft rates) are down both at school and away from school as compared with the 1993 data presented in last year's Annual Report.
· Students ages 12 through 18 were more likely to be victims of serious violent crime away from school than at school.
In 1997, about 24 of every 1,000 students (ages 12 to 18) were victims of serious violent crimes away from school (a total of 635,900 serious violent crimes).
In contrast, only eight of every 1,000 students were victims of serious violent crimes at school or going to and from school (201,800 total) (see figure 2).
M os t in ju rie s t h at oc cur at s choo l a re no t the re su lt o f v iol e nce .
Among children (ages five through 18) who were admitted to a pediatric trauma unit or children's hospital for an injury sustained at school, 90 percent were injured unintentionally through falls, sports, and school equipment (for example, wood shop equipment).
· Falls were the most common type of school injury, accounting for 43 percent of all admissions.
1999
ANNUA L
REP ORT ON
SCH OOL
SAFE TY
3
· In 1997, there were 63 thefts for every 1,000 students (ages 12 to 18) at school (see figure 3).
Theft accounted for about 61 percent of all crime against students at school that year.
S tud e nt s i n sch ool t oda y a re l es s li ke ly to b e vic ti mi ze d th an in p re vio u s ye a rs .
Since 1993, the overall school crime rate for students ages 12 to 18 has declined as have rates of crime outside of school for this group.
· The overall school crime rate between 1993 and 1997 declined, from about 155 school-related crimes for every 1,000 students ages 12 to 18 in 1993 to about 102 such crimes in 1997.
Crime victimization outside of school declined from about 139 crimes for every 1,000 students in this age group in 1993 to 117 such crimes in 1997 (see figure 4).
4
1999
AN NUAL
REPORT
ON
SCHO OL
SAFETY
· In 1997, 5 percent of all 12th graders reported that they had been injured on purpose with a weapon such as a knife, gun, or club during the prior 12 months while they were at school, and 14 percent reported that they had been injured on purpose without a weapon.
These numbers have remained fairly stable over the past 20 years (see figures 5 and 6).
Tea ch er s a re v ict im s of c rim e at s ch oo l as w el l.
As with student crime, most crimes against teachers are thefts.
Teachers in urban schools are more vulnerable to crime at school than are suburban school teachers.
· On average, each year from 1993 to 1997 there were 131,400 violent crimes against teachers at school and 222,800 thefts from teachers at school, as reported by teachers from both public and private schools.
This translates into a rate of 31 violent crimes for every 1,000 teachers and a rate of 53 thefts for every 1,000 teachers.
· On average each year from 1993 to 1997, about 4 out of every 1,000 elementary, middle, and high school teachers were the victims of serious violent crime at school (see figure 7).
· Teachers in urban schools (39 for every 1,000 teachers) were more likely to be victims of violent crime than were teachers in suburban schools (22 for every 1,000 teachers) (see figure 8).
F ew e r st u den ts ar e c ar ryi n g we apo ns an d e ng a gin g i n ph ys i cal fig h ts o n sch ool gr oun d s. Ho we ve r, ce r tain gro ups o f s tu den t s ar e a t gr eate r r isk th an oth er s for th es e act iv it i es .
The presence of weapons and physical fights at school are dangerous and disruptive to the learning environment.
Contrary to public perception, however, student weapon carrying and physical fighting have declined steadily in recent years.
· Between 1993 and 1997, there was a significant decrease in the percentage of high school students who carried a weapon (for example, a club, knife, or gun) on school property, and in the percentage of students in a physical fight on school property, on at least one of the 30 days preceding the survey (see figure 9).
· These declines were similar across sex, grade, and race/ ethnic subgroups, but male students, younger students, and Black and Hispanic students were consistently more likely than their peers to engage in these behaviors.
· About 3 percent of 12th grade students reported carrying a gun to school at least one day during the previous 4week period.
This percentage remained fairly stable from 1994 to 1997 (see figure 10).
There ar e c o ns equ en ces for s tud en t s wh o c ar ry fi rearms to sc ho ol.
· For the 1997-98 school year, States and territories reported that they had expelled an estimated 3,930 students for bringing a firearm to school.
The number of expulsions declined from 6,093 for the 1996-1997 school year.
· In part, this decline is due to improvements in data collection and reporting.
Therefore, caution should be used when interpreting these data.
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAFETY
5
· Fewer than half of the students expelled during the 199798 school year were referred for alternative placements.
Students expelled for firearms often do not receive educational services through alternative programs or schools.
Currently, very little is known about the number or nature of alternative programs.
The U.S. Department of Education is conducting a survey of school districts to help provide better information about these programs and schools.
Information from this study will be available in 2001.
M in or i ty st ude nt s an d y ou ng s tud en ts f eel les s s af e a t s choo l th an o the r s.
A N I N T E R N AT I O N A L P E R SP E C T I V E
The U.S. is not the only country that confronts youth and school violence.
While it is difficult to compare the U.S. to other countries on school safety and youth violence issues, several studies have been conducted across countries that provide comparable data on feelings of safety, bullying, and student behavior.
The data from these studies are presented in this section.
Th e T hird I n te rna tio na l M a th ema t ica l a nd S cie nc es Stu dy ( T IM SS )
· According to the 1998 National Assessment of Educational Progress (NEAP), higher percentages of Black and Hispanic 4th grade students reported feeling "very unsafe" at school (9 percent and 6 percent, respectively) than did White students at that grade level (2 percent).
· According to the 1998 NAEP, compared to 4th and 8th grade students, fewer 12th grade students reported feeling "very unsafe" at school, regardless of race.
6 1999 AN NUAL REPORT ON SCHO OL SAFETY
TIMSS, conducted in 1995, consists of data from half a million students in 4th, 8th, and 12th grades in 41 countries.
The eight countries that had data at all three levels were used in this report.
· Across several countries, older students were more likely than younger students not to have been threatened by another student (see figure 11).
· While, overall, fewer 12th grade students (compared to 4th or 8th grade students) reported being threatened, U.S. 12th graders were more likely to have been threatened than 12th graders from other countries (see figure 11).
Th e H eal th B e hav io r of S choo l Ch ild re n S tudy
This school-based research study, performed for the first time in the United States in 1997-98, has been conducted every four years by European countries since 1982.
The research goal is to increase our understanding of health behaviors, lifestyles, and their context in young people, ages 11 to 15 years.
The study provides data on 120,000 students from 28 countries for the 1997-98 school year.
Fifteen countries included questions on injury and violence, six of which are used in this report.
These countries were selected because their study methods and questions were similar to the United States.
Data for 15year-old students are presented because they are more closely related to the national data presented in the first section of this chapter.
· During the past 12 months, the majority of 15-year-old students across several countries (including the U.S.) have not been in a physical fight (see figure 12).
· During the past 30 days, the majority of 15-year-old students across several countries (including the U.S.) did not carry a weapon for self-defense (see figure 13).
· A substantial majority of 15-year-old students across many countries were not bullied at school (see figure 14).
1999
ANNUA L
REP ORT ON
SCH OOL
SAFE TY
7
· Although the majority of students in many countries were not bullied at school, fewer students reported always feeling safe at school (see figure 15).
Ja pa ne se G ove rnm en t S t ud y
H A R A S S M E N T A N D H AT E C R I M E
A study conducted by the Japanese government found that, in 1997, Japanese schools experienced violence including violence against teachers, violence among students, and property damage.
The most common type of violence occurred among students.
Examples of violent acts occurring among students include arguments among students that resulted in injuries and physical fights.
Acts of violence occurred in 2 percent of elementary schools, 30 percent of middle schools, and 37 percent of high schools.
Approximately 43,000 incidents of bullying occurred in public Japanese elementary, middle, and high schools.
The largest number of bullying incidents occurred among the first year middle school students.
After the first year of middle school, the incidents of bullying dropped progressively at each higher grade level.
Fostering and maintaining a safe learning environment means creating a climate of tolerance in which all students are comfortable, respected, and secure.
However, because of stereotypes, ignorance and intolerance, certain individuals and groups tend to be alienated from their fellow students.
A source of conflict in many schools is the perceived or real problem of bias and unfair treatment of students because of ethnicity, gender, race, social class, religion, disability, nationality, sexual orientation, physical appearance, or some other factor--both by staff and peers.
In this context, the topic of hate crime and harassment has been the subject of national concern, particularly with regard to young people.
This section presents the current status of hate crime and harassment legislation and related statistics.
Defi nit ion o f Ha te Cr i me
Hate crime, as defined in section 280003(a) of the Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994 (28 U.S.C. 994 note), is a term used to describe crimes against individuals where the victim was selected because of the race, skin color, ethnicity/national origin, sexual orientation, gender, religion or disability of any person.
A hate crime under this provision is not, in fact, a specific crime.
Rather, the provision refers to penalty enhancements for crimes motivated by biases against a victim.
If a Federal prosecutor can prove that one or more factors-- such as a
8
1999
AN NUAL
REPORT
ON
SCHO OL
SAFETY
victim's race, religion, disability, or any of the other categories protected by law--motivated a criminal act, hate crime laws can increase the length of an offender's prison sentence by as much as 37 percent.
L aw s th a t P ro te c t Ag ai ns t Hat e Cr i me
A number of federal and state laws prohibit acts or threats of violence, as well as harassment and discrimination, based on race, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender and/or disability.
Federal and state hate crime and civil rights laws may also apply in the school context.
As of July 1999, only eight states do not have any hate crime laws at all (see figure 16).
The applicable federal laws include the following: 18 U.S.C.
Section 245.
Section 245, the principal federal hate crime statute, prohibits intentional use of force against a person because of his or her race, color, religion, or national origin, and because he or she was engaged in a "federally protected activity," such as enrolling in or attending any public school or college.
Legislation has been introduced which would amend Section 245 to include crimes committed because of the victim's sexual orientation, gender or disability, and to eliminate the "federally protected activity" requirement.
Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
Title VI and regulations promulgated under Title VI prohibit discrimination, including harassment, on the basis of race, color, and national origin by institutions that receive federal funding.
Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972.
Title IX and regulations promulgated under Title IX prohibit discrimination, including harassment based on sex, by institutions that receive federal funding.
Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973.
Section 504 and regulations promulgated under Section 504 prohibit discrimination, including harassment, based on disability by institutions that receive federal funding.
H at e Cr im e St at isti c s
The problem of hate crime in the United States may well be underreported.
Complicating matters further is the variation among state definitions of hate or bias-motivated crime.
While such crimes typically refer to criminal acts motivated by a victim's perceived sexual orientation, religious affiliation, disability, race, color, ethnic background or national origin, not all states define hate crime the same way nor do all local jurisdictions report hate crime to the FBI.
In addition, the age of the offender is rarely, if ever, reported, so it is not possible to determine whether a hate crime is committed by an adult or juvenile.
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
9
H ara ss me nt a nd H at e Cr i me St a tis ti cs Am o ng Youth
Currently, the Health Behavior of School Children Survey does provide some data on the prevalence of "bullying" or harassment among 11-, 13-, and 15-year-olds in the United States.
According to recent data, approximately 15 percent of these youth had been bullied because of their religion or race.
In addition, over 30 percent of these youth had been bullied by sexual jokes, comments, or gestures directed at them.
The U.S. Departments of Education and Justice are modifying several data collection surveys to help capture harassment and hate crime incidents at school and on college campuses.
In January 1999, the ongoing National Crime Victimization Survey (NCVS) included a hate crime item on its incident report for the first time.
At the same time, the School Crime Supplement to the National Crime Victimization Survey also included items on hate language and graffiti at school.
If these items prove valid and reliable, they will be reported in the 2000 Annual Report on School Safety.
Hate crime items are also being tested for inclusion in the School Survey on Crime and Safety, a survey of elementary and secondary school principals sponsored by the U.S. Department of Education and scheduled to be in the field in 2000.
Results from this survey will be available in 2001.
Hate crime items are being added to the National CORE Alcohol and Drug Survey, a survey of post-secondary institutions which gathers information about crime and violence on college campuses.
Finally, hate crime and harassment items will be included in the School Health Policies and Programs Study (SHPPS), conducted by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
SHPPS will collect data from state and local education agencies and elementary and secondary schools.
The FBI's Uniform Crime Reports: Hate Crime Statistics provides national data on hate crimes, but does not provide specific data for hate crimes at schools.
10
19 99
ANNUAL
REPORT
ON
SCHO OL S AFE TY
Safe Schools/Healthy Students--Collaboration in Action CHAPTER 2
Th e v ast maj or ity of the Natio n's schools a re safe place s. Ho we ver, some schools do have seriou s crime an d viole nce p roblems th at compromise t he learn in g en viron men t a nd endange r children and tea chers.
Scho ols ca nn ot effectively deal wit h th ese probl ems w ithout significant community-wi de supp or t .
Ma ny communiti es a re successf ully reduci ng schoo l cri me and violence b y ado ptin g compr ehensiv e, in te gra ted communitywide plans th at promot e health y chi ldhood d eve lopment and address the proble ms of school viole nce and alcoh ol and oth er dr ug ab use.
Howe ve r, t he se communities are the exception, no t th e rule.
In S pr ing 1 999, the President an noun ced the Safe Schoo ls/He althy Stude nt s In it iat iv e, a unique g ran t program jointly admi ni ster ed by th e U.S. De par t men ts of Educat ion, H ealt h and Human Ser v ices, a nd Justice .
The Init iat ive p romotes compr ehensive, inte grate d communit y- wide strategi es for school sa fe ty an d he alth y chi ld d ev elo pment across th e countr y.
The se strat eg ie s prov ide st udents, scho ols, and communiti es t he b en efit of en ha nce d educa tional, mental heal th, socia l ser v ice, law enforcement, a nd , a s a pprop ria te, juvenile justice system ser vi ces th at can b olster healt hy childh ood dev elo pme nt and pre vent violence a nd alcohol an d other dr ug abuse .
11
19 99
ANN UAL
REPORT
ON
SCHOOL
S AFE TY
The Safe Schools/Healthy Students Initiative draws on the best practices of the education, justice, social service, and mental health systems to promote a comprehensive, integrated problem-solving process for use by communities in addressing school violence.
This process, which was highlighted in the 1998 Annual Report, includes (1) establishing school-community partnerships; (2) identifying and measuring the problem; (3) setting measurable goals and objectives; (4) identifying appropriate research-based programs and strategies; (5) implementing programs and strategies in an integrated fashion; (6) evaluating the outcomes of programs and strategies; and (7) revising the plan on the basis of evaluation information.
The Initiative requires comprehensive, integrated communitywide plans to address at least the following six elements: (1) safe school environment; (2) prevention and early intervention programs that address violence, alcohol and other drugs; (3) school and community mental health preventive and treatment intervention services; (4) early childhood psychosocial and emotional development programs; (5) educational reform; and (6) safe school policies.
Plans must be developed in partnership with, at a minimum, the local educational agency, local public mental health authority, local law enforcement agency, family members, students, and juvenile justice officials.
The Agencies awarded 54 Safe Schools/Healthy Students Initiative grants to local educational agencies in partnership with local law enforcement and public mental health authorities.
Awards range from up to $3 million per year for urban school districts, up to $2 million per year for suburban school districts, and up to $1 million per year for rural school districts and tribal schools.
A national evaluation of the Safe Schools/Healthy Students Initiative will be conducted to document the effectiveness of collaborative community efforts to promote safe schools and provide opportunities for healthy childhood development.
In subsequent Annual Reports, information from the evaluation will be reported to provide progress on the Safe Schools/Healthy Students Initiative sites and document their lessons learned.
Following are descriptions of the 54 Safe Schools/Healthy Students grant recipients.
URBAN SITES Jonesboro, Ar ka nsa s
Partners: Jonesboro Public Schools Rivendell Behavioral Health Services Jonesboro Police Department Jonesboro Public Schools serve 20,460 young people under the age of 18 in Craighead County, which includes four school districts.
In March 1998, two middle school students shot numerous people, killing four students and a teacher.
Crime rates for juveniles (including use of alcohol and other drugs, physical force, and weapons) have increased 41% since 1990.
The Jonesboro Safe Schools Initiative will serve to expand and centralize services to the area's youth and families.
Key components of the program are to: enhance the physical design of the buildings by adding fencing, lighting, and security equipment; expand alcohol and drug abuse training and education; offer expanded school-based mental health services; provide an alternative therapeutic setting to continue the education of students who are temporarily suspended; provide education and daycare for the children of teenage mothers; provide summer in-home services for atrisk children and families; provide training and forums for teachers to develop best practices strategies; develop policies and procedures to enhance the program's elements; and create a formal mechanism for program evaluation.
Kindergarten through 12th grade curricula will incorporate alcohol and other drug education, anger management, and other appropriate social skills development.
Alternative therapeutic settings will be established to continue the education of students who are temporarily suspended.
L o s A nge le s, C a li fornia
Partners: Belmont Cluster, Los Angeles Unified School District Los Angeles County Department of Mental Health Los Angeles Police Department Thirty-seven thousand students attend Belmont Cluster's 34 schools and children's centers.
Upwards of 40% of residents have lived in the United States for fewer than five years, and the same percentage live at or below poverty level.
Project SECURE's mission is to create a community better able to support and nurture its children and youth.
The project aims to address gaps in mental health services by providing psychological and family counseling to children
12
1 999
A NN UAL
RE PO RT
O N S CHOOL
SAFETY
under age four that have been identified by early childhood service providers.
Home health visits for teen mothers and their infants will be provided with an emphasis on keeping the teen parent enrolled in school.
School-aged children identified as needing psychological services will be able to access them on-site.
Additional after-school programs will be implemented, including a police athletic league to provide youth opportunities for prosocial involvement.
R ive rs i de, Cali f ornia
infrastructure, and institutionalize interagency collaboration, to create and sustain health and safety activities in all schools.
Through this grant, the Wellness Schools program will expand to include 10 elementary schools and seven high schools serving approximately 13,189 youth and their families in addition to the 17 middle schools already served.
Denver, Co l ora do
Partners: Riverside Unified School District Riverside County Mental Health Department Riverside Police Department There are 81 known gangs in Riverside and gang membership increased 300% from 1991 to 1996.
Five schools in particular have been the most adversely affected.
The schools have consistently higher rates than the district average of violent incidents, suspensions/expulsions, and students with emotional and behavioral disorders.
The program proposed by the Riverside Unified School District will establish Wellness Centers on the five campuses to promote healthy lifestyles, and to lower the incidence of violence and alcohol and drug abuse among the community's youth.
Each Wellness Center (comprised of a team that includes a family advocate, licensed clinical social worker, probation officer, and police officer) will provide assessment, counseling, and referrals, and family outreach and after-school programs.
Ongoing case management will ensure that family needs are met with one point of access.
In addition, an intervention/diversion program at the University of California at Riverside will provide students with mentoring, employment opportunities, and exposure to a university setting.
Sa n Fr an c isc o, Cali f ornia
Partners: Denver Public Schools Mental Health Corporation of Denver Denver Police Department The Denver Public Schools is an urban school district serving 69,000 children of many cultures and ethnicities.
Over 27% of children live in poverty, and 40% of the elementary schools have mobility rates over 100%.
Almost 35% of freshmen fail to graduate.
School funding for psychologists, social workers, and other family support has decreased over the last few years despite a 21% growth in the population.
The Denver Police report that approximately three in every ten youth ages 10 to 17 have been arrested.
The Denver Community Partnership intends to make schools safer by training early childhood providers on early identification of risk factors and by implementing a schoolbased violence prevention curriculum to reach 5,000 young children.
A home visitation/parent education program will be provided for 150 teen mothers during the prenatal period continuing through age three.
An additional 350 children ages birth to eight and their families will receive support services through Head Start and Child Care Centers.
Children will also be linked to services through Community/Schools Assistance Teams, and individualized plans will be developed for truant students to help them reintegrate into school.
After-school programming will be expanded at six middle schools that will also serve as Neighborhood Centers.
Uniformed police officers and additional school security officers will be added.
Ne w Hav en, Con n ec ticu t
Partners: San Francisco Unified School District Department of Public Health San Francisco Police Department Almost 50% of the San Francisco Unified School District's students receive free or reduced cost lunch.
Academic performance, literacy in particular, remains well below national averages.
Experimentation with alcohol is beginning at earlier ages, and drugs are increasingly available at schools.
The San Francisco Unified School District Wellness project has three goals: (1) to reduce the prevalence of drug and weapon use, and violent behavior; (2) to improve the capacity of teachers, staff, parents and students to create safe and healthy school environments; and (3) to build an
Partners: New Haven Board of Education Connecticut State Department of Children and Families New Haven Department of Police Services The New Haven Public School system serves 19,385 students grades K-12.
The annual drop-out rate for grades 912 is 9.7%, as compared to 3.9% statewide.
Rates for juvenile crime are high, with 2,055 per 100,000 youth being arrested in 1995.
This figure is 306% higher than the state average.
1999
ANNUAL
REPORT ON
SCH OOL
SAF ETY
13
The goals of the New Haven initiative are to create an infrastructure of collaboration and to expand current efforts to improve school safety and child well-being.
Among the activities included in the program are expansion of the child development-community policing program, enhancement of the school/police truancy initiative, and provision of full access to comprehensive mental health services for all school children at risk for mental health problems, academic failure, and psychosocial impairment.
Waterbury, C on n ecti c ut
Ne wa rk, De l aw are
Partners: Christina School District Department of Services for Children, Youth and Their Families State Law Enforcement and the Office of the Attorney General The Christina School District serves 20,299 students.
All but one school is Title I eligible, and 32% of the students qualify for free or reduced meals.
Twenty-five percent of the District's students reside within Wilmington's Enterprise Community (EC), which represents Delaware's most economically distressed area, with a 12.4% unemployment rate and a 31.3% poverty rate.
The Christina School District project has three goals: (1) to build on existing services to create a comprehensive, integrated system of community services, mental health prevention, treatment, and intervention programs for students and families; (2) to develop a safe, disruption-free, drug-free learning environment that improves academic performance; and (3) to develop socio-emotional competencies among students and preschool age children to foster resilience and prosocial behavior.
Pre-schools are located in several elementary schools to ensure that all eligible children have the opportunity to participate in age- and developmentallyappropriate settings.
Socio-emotional Skills Groups are held weekly by the school psychologist and counselor in each school.
A Wellness Center is housed at each of the District's three high schools and staffed by a nurse, social worker, counselor and part-time physician to provide a continuum of supports in dealing with children with mild-to-moderate behavior problems.
A School/Community/EC Liaison will coordinate the provision of services by the Family Support Partnership agencies to District residents in the EC.
Was hin gt on , DC
Partners: Waterbury, Connecticut Department of Education Connecticut Department of Children and Families Waterbury Police Department Over 60% of Waterbury students receive free and reduced price meals.
The school has identified 381 students with a serious emotional disability.
There are no specific services in place for the approximately 1,500 students who are suspended from school annually for violent acts.
There is typically a six week waiting period for families referred for family violence intervention services.
The goal of the Waterbury initiative is to infuse research-based prevention programming into after-school services; improve the intensity and coordination of services to children in trouble; reach every expectant mother with home- and clinic-based prenatal primary care; and use the city's growing network of after-school programs as a starting point for applying high-performance work strategies to the improvement of teaching and learning.
Through this initiative, child health services will be expanded to include home health visits for new mothers.
Early assessment and interventions will be provided to 150 police- and courtreferred children, ages three to eight.
A citywide Family Information Center will be established to engage a minimum of 900 parents.
Elementary students in after-school programs will complete life skills training, while middle and high school students will participate in violence prevention programs directed by trained uniformed officers.
Up to 100 students will be identified for intensive outpatient services linked closely to their educational day.
Officers and student teams will apply problem-solving tactics to improve habitual truants' bonding to school.
Partners: Maya Angelou Public Charter School District of Columbia Commission on Mental Health Services Metropolitan Police Department The DC Charter Schools Coalition's 17 schools serve 8,400 high-risk students, most of whom are two or more years below grade level.
Forty-one percent of District children live below the poverty level, 21% under extreme economic deprivation, and 39% in high-risk families.
Sixty-three percent of DC students are eligible for free school lunch.
During 1993-94, the dropout rate was 20.9%, more than twice the national urban figure; only 53% of DC youth graduate from high school.
14
1999
ANN UAL
REPO RT O N S CHOOL
SA FET Y
The program will provide mental health, after-school, and related special enrichment programs and services to the predominantly poor, African-American population in the community.
Grant funds will directly support mental health teams for all schools, as well as Peaceful Schools conflict resolution training, and hiring a school/community resource coordinator in each school to build strong after-school programs and coordinate services at the school level.
F t. Mye r s, Fl or i da
Partners: The School District of Lee County Florida Department of Children and Family Services - Alcohol, Drugs and Mental Health Lee County Sheriff 's Office The 3,281 teachers in the School District of Lee County serve over 53,000 students.
The percentage of students who report using drugs, alcohol, and tobacco is significantly higher than the national average.
The primary focus of BRIDGES is on prevention through safety, education, and intervention with at-risk youth.
Early childhood services currently offered to children ages four to five will be extended to include pregnant mothers and children ages birth to three and their families, through the Head Start program.
A licensed mental health clinician will identify children with behavioral concerns, provide strategies to parents/teachers, and implement playgroups with parents and their babies/toddlers.
BRIDGES will expand the use of a curriculum to prevent drug abuse and violence.
School social workers will be trained in multisystemic therapy to provide family and community-based treatment.
A School Safety Analyst will be appointed to each of the three different school zones covered by the grant to gather information on violent activities on school campuses; identify users of alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs as well as those involved in gangs; and provide feedback to prevention and intervention services.
Lar g o, F l or ida
with infants and toddlers to improve the healthy development of young children and increase school readiness.
The Health Department will initiate a social marketing campaign to develop county-wide messages of nonviolence and promote specific programs that prevent violent behavior among youth.
This initiative will also increase the availability of parent support groups, parent education and outreach services, as well as structured activities for youth.
Mental health wrap-around services will be available for children who lack financial resources, and the Partnership Program, which offers short-term intervention to families of children at risk of abuse and neglect will be replicated in other locations.
A Family Resources On-Campus Intervention Program that provides an alternative to out-ofschool suspension will be expanded.
De s M o ine s , I ow a
Partners: Des Moines Independent School District Polk County Health Services, Inc.
Des Moines Police Department Polk County serves students in both urban and rural areas.
Almost 16,000 students are receiving free and reduced cost meals at school.
In 1990, one in eight families was living at or below the poverty level.
The students in Polk County have alcohol and drugs readily available to them: 88% of students have used alcohol and almost 25% of students have used either marijuana or cocaine.
The Polk County program includes plans to increase access to training for in-home child-care providers countywide.
Also, scholarships will be provided for staff at childcare centers to attend child development training programs.
In addition to enhancing the existing K-12 alcohol, drug and violence curricula in schools, training for parents of K6 graders will be provided.
At the middle and high school levels, 13 case managers will be added, as well as two additional prevention specialists.
A summer program, focusing on violence and drug abuse prevention, will strive to improve school attendance.
A local managed health care organization will offer training to elementary school nurses and counselors to assist them in the development of their assessment and referral process.
Lo uisv i ll e, Ke ntu c ky
Partners: Pinellas County Schools Department of Children and Families Pinellas County Sheriff 's Office More than 107,000 students are enrolled in 149 schools in Pinellas County.
The percentage of elementary students eligible for free and reduced cost lunch is 44.9%; one-third of Pinellas County youth live in single-parent homes.
Target schools, based upon a ranking for risk factors, will be selected as demonstration/training sites.
Pinellas County will expand parent-training activities for families
Partners: Jefferson County Public Schools Seven Counties Services, Inc.
Louisville Police Department One-third of this project's targeted schools are located in an Enterprise Community.
More than one-half of the students
199 9
AN NU AL
REPORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAF ETY
15
are economically disadvantaged, and 60% of elementary, 70% of middle-school, and 80% of high school students receive free or reduced price meals.
The goals of Project SHIELD are to: (1) strengthen community partnerships that support safe, disciplined, and drug-free schools; (2) help students develop skills and emotional resilience to achieve positive mental health, engage in pro-social behavior, and avoid violence and drug use; and (3) ensure that students are able to learn in a safe, disciplined, and drug-free environment.
To support early childhood development, a Primary Mental Health Program will be conducted, providing individual interactive play sessions for children who are beginning to show adjustment difficulties.
To enhance mental health prevention and intervention, Functional Family Therapy and Multi-Systemic Therapy will be implemented.
Teacher training will focus on classroom behavior management.
To support school safety, teams at the district and school level will be trained on Crime Prevention Through Environmental Design.
Baltimore , M ar yland
Springfie ld, Ma s sa chu set ts
Partners: Springfield Public Schools Commonwealth of Massachusetts Department of Mental Health Springfield Police Department The poverty rate in Springfield is 17.7% and the city ranks 341 out of 354 towns and cities in Massachusetts for median household income.
In 1998-1999, 77% of Springfield students received free or reduced cost meals.
Early childhood psychosocial and emotional development programs will serve all high-risk families with young children and all high-risk mothers prior to the birth of a child.
Physical and mental health services, including parenting skills training, family support opportunities, crisis intervention, and integrated therapy to caregivers and teachers, will address the social and emotional needs of children.
Alternatives to substance abuse and violence are proposed through social and recreational activities and mentoring.
School and community mental health preventive and treatment services will consist of screening and assessment in the school setting; school-based mental health prevention and early intervention services for at-risk students and their families; referral and follow-up with local mental health agencies; training and consultation to school personnel; and support services to families.
Educational reform will consist of two training and development efforts in the public schools designed both to address bullying, harassment, and violence, and to promote early identification and strategic intervention strategies aimed at problem student behaviors.
A safe school environment will be accomplished by school resource officers, school facility design, and school security measures.
La nsi n g, Mi c hig an
Partners: Baltimore City Public School System Baltimore Mental Health System, Inc.
Baltimore City Police Department This year, Baltimore City Public School System will serve 105,379 students.
Of these students, 67.9% qualify for free/reduced cost meals.
Homicide is the leading cause of death for adolescents, with a violent death rate of 146.6 per 100,000 youth, and the juvenile arrest rate is three times the national average at 685.3 per 100,000 youth.
The special education rate for the district is 38% higher than for the rest of the state, and only 36% of high school students graduate on time.
Through a city-wide process, the school district will work towards the following goals: children enter school ready to succeed; children and young adults receive an effective education; children live in nurturing families; children live in safe communities; and families become selfreliant.
The initiative will ensure that pregnant youth and young mothers in target schools are linked with home visiting and clinic-based programs, including access to nurses.
Plans also include a substantial increase in after-school, summer school, and family support programs.
Mental Health Systems and the Public School System will jointly oversee an extensive program of school-based mental health services, and wraparound services will be developed.
Neighborhood parent liaisons will facilitate linkage with and support to parents, while an energized program of community policing will increase law enforcement involvement in schools and surrounding areas.
16 1999 ANN UAL REPO RT O N S CHOOL SA FET Y
Partners: Lansing School District Clington-Eaton-Ingham Community Mental Health Board Ingham County Sheriff 's Department The Lansing School District serves students in 34 elementary schools, four middle schools, and three high schools.
Over one-quarter of the district's students live at or below poverty level.
Current mental and physical health services do not meet the great need of many high-risk families, especially those with preschool children.
An extensive network of early childhood services, coordinated at the community level, will be oriented for highrisk children ages birth to five and their families to assure that children enter school ready to learn.
The early childhood program will include increased personnel for family
consultation, outreach, screening, referral for mental health and other services, improved connections with primary health care, and enhanced pre-school programs.
Screening and referral for high-risk kindergarten children, a casualty of previous budget cuts, will be reinstated.
School staff, including kindergarten teachers, will be trained in timely recognition and referral of troubled students and families before violence occurs.
Evidence-based prevention programs will include parent education, increased parental involvement, and teaching children and youth skills to avoid substance abuse and violence.
S t. L oui s, Mis s ou ri
Ral eig h, Nor t h Ca rolina
Partners: Wake County Public School System Wake County Human Services Agency Wake County Sheriff 's Department and City of Raleigh Police Department The Wake County School District serves 92,000 students.
Risk factors in the community include 10.32 juvenile violent crime arrests per 1,000 children in 1996, compared to 1.82 for the state and 1.34 for the nation; as well as 4.03 juvenile drug arrests per 1,000 children in 1996, compared to 2.35 for the state and 2.07 for the nation.
Nearly 10% of students were living in families in poverty, and 21.6% of students receive free and/or reduced cost lunches.
Early childhood programming will include expanding the existing community-wide capacity to provide in-home support services for at-risk families in communities with high concentrations of multiple risk factors.
Community mentoring organizations will provide individual mentors for students considered at-risk.
The program will provide diversionary options for adjudicated youth, as well as disciplinary options for all students.
School-based screening, assessment, referral, and follow-up services, along with mental health prevention and early intervention services, will be expanded.
Substance abuse programs and in-home support services for families with young children will also be expanded.
Training will be provided for pre-school, kindergarten, and other teachers and staff, as they work with youth in various classes and after school programs.
W ins to n-S al em, No r th Ca rolina
Partners: St. Louis Public Schools City of St. Louis Mental Health Board of Trustees St. Louis Metropolitan Police Department St. Louis, with a population of 397,000, is one of the poorest cities in the nation.
Almost one in four city residents, and over 55% of its children, live in poverty.
The district experiences a high school cumulative drop out rate of 61%.
The St. Louis Partnership for Safe Schools/Healthy Students aims to help youth develop the skills and resources to avoid drug use and violent behavior and to establish and maintain safe, disciplined, drug-free school environments.
Early childhood psychosocial and emotional development programs will be coordinated through a case management system.
Three training courses in substance abuse and violence prevention will be conducted, and the Safe and DrugFree Schools Program will train school prevention teams in all elementary, middle and high schools.
School and community mental health prevention and treatment services will be provided in two, seven-school clusters as a pilot for school-linked services to be implemented across the community.
The International Institute will support mental health services for immigrant families.
Educational reform efforts will consist of training students in grades 2 to 12 as conflict managers and establishing student-led mediation services at middle and high schools.
Partners: Winston-Salem/Forsyth County Schools Center Point Human Services Winston-Salem Police Department Winston-Salem/Forsyth County Schools serve a student population in a small urban community.
Infant mortality is substantially higher than in the rest of the state.
Approximately 18% of children live at or below the poverty level.
Since l994, violent crime rates for youth under 18 have been higher than the state and national levels, and each year more than half of all young offenders in the county have been arrested for violent and assault crimes.
Drug arrests among county youth have doubled since l994.
A maternal home visitation program will be implemented with teenage mothers to improve prenatal care and early childhood development.
Pre-K and kindergarten mental health services will be expanded to link young children to mental health services and to remedy or improve prob-
1999
ANNU AL
RE PORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAF ETY
17
lem behaviors early on.
Elementary students will be provided with an age-appropriate and grade-sequential curriculum that will cover topics such as problem-solving skills, violence prevention, school drop out issues, and character education.
Parents will be offered training in violence prevention, communication, discipline, and problem-solving.
Students in high juvenile crime neighborhoods will be offered after-school programs designed to increase the involvement of caregivers/parents in their children's education and to provide extended-day care during peak hours of juvenile crime.
Teachers and administrators will receive training in bully prevention, anger management, and violence prevention, and will be provided with intervention and referral information.
The number of full-time school resource officers at middle schools will be increased to help reduce truancy rates.
Surveillance cameras will be installed in schools located in neighborhoods with high juvenile crime rates.
C l ev el a nd , Oh io
Co lu mb u s, Ohi o
Partners: Columbus Public Schools Franklin County Alcohol, Drub Abuse and Mental Health Board City of Columbus Department of Public Safety The Columbus School District serves almost 65,000 students.
The student graduation rate is 56.8%, well below the state performance standard of 90%.
Thirty-seven percent of the students are considered economically disadvantaged.
In 1994, Columbus was designated an Enterprise Community, with 18 census tracts in the city center that qualified for the designation.
In March 1999, Empowerment Zone status was conferred.
Through the establishment of school/community Resource Development Teams assigned to serve a high school and its feeder middle and elementary schools, students and families will be linked with education, prevention, intervention and referral services in the school and community.
Pre-K and Head Start programs will be strengthened and expanded, especially by the addition of school nurses.
Reading programs will be piloted to assist in the early development of reading skills.
Prevention and early intervention programs and services will be made available to schools as needed from Community Mental Health Services.
A Safe Schools Audit will be conducted of all policies, procedures, and activities.
This will be followed by an expansion of after-school programs to students in all schools.
Por tl a nd, O r egon
Partners: Cleveland Municipal School District Cuyahoga County Mental Health Board City of Cleveland Police Department Eighty percent of Cleveland's students receive free or reduced lunch.
Eighty percent of elementary school students in Cleveland reported that they had seen someone else beaten up at school, and 40% had seen someone being shot at.
Project SYNERGY will serve high-risk students and families in ten elementary schools, five middle schools, and five high schools.
For elementary, middle and secondary school students, the project will implement several drug and violence prevention strategies, including a program designed to influence social norms and strengthen social skills.
The partners will also provide a part-time mental health intervention specialist to reduce the mental health consequences of exposure to violence and victimization.
The specialists will also establish an intervention assistance team in each of the participating schools to screen and assess students who have health, emotional, behavioral or learning concerns.
Additional teacher professional development will be offered in mental health, as well as drug and violence prevention.
As part of the district's ongoing reform efforts, the project will expand instructional time and afterschool activities.
Partners: Portland Public Schools, District 1 Multnomah County Community and Family Services Multnomah County Juvenile and Adult Community Justice Portland Public Schools, the largest district in the Pacific Northwest, serves 55,831 students from inner-city, suburban, and rural communities.
Thirty-eight percent of the students qualify for free or reduced-price lunch.
Over 60 different languages are spoken in the district, and students whose home language is other than English represent 8% of the enrollment.
The Portland Partnership Plan will ensure that all students attending Portland Public Schools can learn in a safe, healthy, disciplined, and drug-free environment.
Early childhood psychological and emotional development programs will be provided by building the capacity of the child care provider system.
Identification, assessment and referrals for students in need of mental health services will be
18
19 99
A NN UAL
REPO RT O N
SCHOOL
SAFETY
expanded in schools which serve many of the district's highrisk students.
Mental health specialists will provide individual and group therapy services for students and their families and consultation to these middle and alternative schools.
Safe school policies will link policies and practices used to respond to attendance and disciplinary violations with services and supports necessary to improve student behavior and increase school safety.
Springfie ld, O regon
Ph il ad el p hia , Pe nns yl va nia
Partners: Schools District of Philadelphia Cabinet for Children and Families Philadelphia Police Department Philadelphia, the fifth largest school district in the country, enrolls more than 210,000 children, of whom nearly 80% come from low-income families.
The average rate of high school graduation is 52%, and drops as low as 20% in some high schools.
The goals of Philadelphia's Taking Prevention to Scale plan are to increase the number of children entering first grade with the social, physical, cognitive, and emotional skills required for learning; increase the number of students promoted and ready to graduate from high school prepared for post-secondary success; and decrease the frequency of, and prevent the occurrence of, further youth-related violence and crime.
Activities under Taking Prevention to Scale include: increasing the number of family centers and home services for early intervention; strengthening school academic and mental/behavioral health service systems; creating alternatives to violence through more after-school, community, and year-round recreation programs; and creating more truancy courts .
Pittsbur gh , P en ns ylva n ia
Partners: Springfield School District 19 Lane County Health and Human Services Department, Mental Health Division City of Springfield Police Department More than 14% of families with children under 18 living in Springfield School District 19 are below the poverty line.
The percentages of students on free/reduced lunch are near 27% in Eugene, 36% in Bethel, and 33% in Springfield.
In the spring of 1998, Springfield was the site of tragic events in which a student shot and killed fellow students and his parents.
The project goals of the Springfield Urban Safe Schools Consortium are to help students develop the skills and resilience necessary to promote positive mental health, engage in prosocial behavior, and prevent violent behavior and drug use; to ensure that all students in these school districts are able to learn in a safe, disciplined, and alcoholand drug-free environment; and to help develop an infrastructure that will support community development and institutionalize and sustain integrated services after Federal funding has ended.
The Effective Behavioral Support (EBS), a successful drug and violence prevention and early intervention system that is already in place at some schools, will be expanded.
The EBS system will include early prevention services to promote mental health.
It will make schools a major partner and an access point for mental health services and ensure that services are delivered at schools.
Other activities will include increasing partnerships with law enforcement, implementing mentoring programs, addressing behavioral issues among high risk youth, and addressing family violence.
To increase school safety, the Crime Prevention Through Environmental Design analyses of schools will be completed.
Partners: School District of Pittsburgh Allegheny County Department of Human Services The City of Pittsburgh Police Bureau The large urban School District of Pittsburgh enrolls nearly 40,000 students.
Sixty-four percent of students receive free or reduced cost lunch, and 32% of families receive public assistance.
The goals of the Pittsburgh Safe Schools/Healthy Students Initiative are to help Pittsburgh Public School (PPS) students develop the skills and emotional resilience necessary to promote positive mental health, engage in prosocial behavior, and prevent violent behavior and drug use; ensure that all students who attend PPSs are able to learn in a safe, disciplined, and drug-free environment; and develop an infrastructure that will institutionalize and sustain integrated services after Federal funding has ended.
The early childhood program will provide training to parents and develop a parent support network.
It also will provide additional support to supplement home and preschool experiences for children with readiness deficiencies.
Alcohol and other drugs and violence prevention activities will include educating parents by conducting regionally
1 999
ANNU AL
RE PORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAF ETY
19
sponsored workshops and seminars at schools and in communities.
School and community mental health services will include training school staff on how to conduct and/or access screening and assessment services, as well as increasing the availability of behavior health professionals.
Additional services will include hiring and training three Parent Support Specialists.
H ous ton , Texas
Partners: Houston Independent School District (HISD) Houston Health Department Houston Police Department The HISD is the largest school district in Texas, made up of two contiguous school feeder patterns, serving 212,000 students.
Student involvement with alcohol and drugs is overrepresented at every grade level.
Even at the elementary school level, rates of marijuana use doubled, from 2% in 1996 to 4% in 1998.
The school district also has high rates of school violence and victimization, suspensions, drop-out, truancy, and expulsions.
The Houston Safe Schools/Healthy Students Initiative will hire infant mental health specialists to provide schooland home-based services to preschool children.
The Initiative will implement a multi-family relationship-building program, and establish after-school programs.
An existing comprehensive dropout-prevention program will be expanded to serve 13 additional elementary schools, employ additional clinical social workers and counselors, and offer case management and coordination services.
The Initiative will establish programs to reintegrate students from the juvenile justice system and to manage information and analyze data on violent and non-criminal incidents.
School security measures will be intensified and amplified, including the installation of metal detectors and surveillance cameras at all school facilities, and assignment of probation officers to the high schools.
Bremer to n , Washington
estimated 2,300 students attending local schools.
OESD, through Special Education Departments, Head Start, and an Early Childhood Education Assistance Program, will expand and enhance services for birth through kindergarten.
Prevention and intervention specialists will provide student assistance programs at the middle and high school level.
Mental health therapists will be assigned to serve schools, and the OESD will contract with local community mental health agencies to deliver key mental health services.
Multisystemic therapy will be delivered to students who have been identified as in need of intensive services.
Safe school policies will continue to be implemented and reinforced through the activities of the Regional Crisis Response Team.
Proposed strategies for educational reform include professional development and training that entails classroom management; crisis planning and preparedness; violence, alcohol, and other drug prevention curriculum; and discipline.
M ad iso n , W isconsin
Partners: Madison Metropolitan School District Dane County Department of Human Services Madison Police Department The Madison Metropolitan School District (MMSD) serves approximately 25,000 students.
Between 1990 and 1998, the percentage of students at a low-income level rose from 20% to 25%.
The suspension rate has risen dramatically, and there are increases in the rates of truancy, violent and disruptive behavior, drug and alcohol use, low birth weight babies, and crime.
The goals of Madison Metropolitan School District and its partners are to focus on a safe school environment, helping students develop to their full potential, building the assets needed for a successful transition to adulthood, and building a greater sense of community among children and adults in Madison schools.
Major initiatives include expanded after-school programming, new interdisciplinary positive behavior support teams for the schools, expanded home visitation services for families with young children, professional development for frontline youth-serving staff, expanding the Educational Resource Officer program, and an array of school security and remodeling improvements.
Partners: Olympic Educational Service District (OESD) Kitsap, Jefferson, Peninsula 
Kitsap County is an urban region with a large, decaying inner city.
There are seven tribal communities in the region and an
20
19 99
A NN UAL
REPO RT O N
SCHOOL
SAFETY
SUBURBAN SITES Sa n Lui s Obi s p o, C a li for nia
Partners: San Luis Obispo County Office of Education San Luis Obispo Department of Mental Health San Luis Obispo County Sheriff 's Office Twenty percent of family households in San Luis Obispo County are headed by a single parent.
Thirty-six percent of the families live below the poverty level.
Up to 28% of the students qualify for free or reduced cost meal programs.
The San Luis Obispo County Safe Schools/Healthy Students program will add two part-time resource teachers to free early childhood teachers to screen, identify, and work with young children who are at risk for behavior problems and their families, including through home visits.
The Department of Mental Health will provide diagnosis and referrals, individual and family counseling and solution-focused interventions.
Mental health consultants will be added in eleven new preschool sites.
Elementary school children and families will participate in a violence and substance abuse prevention program.
The initiative will also provide literacy and social skills training for monolingual Spanish families.
A counselor will be hired to develop and implement a program to reintegrate students from the Court Community Schools into public school districts.
Two part-time Community Safety Resource Specialists will provide community organizing and training around school safety.
Oa hu, Ha w aii
through meaningful, differentiated instruction.
A district action team will ensure school safety through training, development of crisis plans, school resource officers, and the use of retired police officers in dual roles as mentors and security officers.
Cicero, Ill in ois
Partners: J.S. Morton High School District Filmore Center for Human Services Berwyn 
At least 38% of the students in the district qualify for free or reduced cost school lunch.
The truancy rate and drop out rates for the area are higher than the state average.
The teenage pregnancy rate is increasing, with one to two new pregnancies being reported each week.
Over the past ten years, there has been a 70% increase in the number of persons living below the poverty level.
The district's integrated, comprehensive communitywide strategy is aimed at fostering healthy child development, preventing the initiation of violence and abuse of alcohol and other drugs, and enhancing mental health and social services to at-risk youth and their families.
A community health educator will facilitate a variety of programs specifically for teen mothers.
Teen mothers will also receive home visits, assistance with daycare, health care services, and preschool services.
A new violence prevention curriculum will be implemented at 20 elementary schools.
To foster attachment to adult role models, community mentors will work to establish recreational and/or learning experiences through after school programs.
A network of Case Managers specializing in working with high risk families will provide wrap-around services.
A bilingual/bicultural psychologist will facilitate student assistance programming.
Outreach workers will make home visits to truant students to increase attendance and graduate rates.
Each school will undergo a safe school audit; school resource officers will be added and appropriate security measures will be instituted.
Auburn , N ew York
Partners: Central Oahu District Hawaii Department of Health Honolulu Police Department The Central Oahu District enrolls 34,500 students.
Approximately 10% of the students are identified as requiring special education services.
Students dismissed from school for possession of a weapon, possession or use of illicit drugs, and other serious offenses jumped from eight incidents in 1996-97 to 30 incidents last year.
Six new preschools with a structured curriculum involving parent and child will be implemented and serve as a means to network additional services to these families.
Each school's Community-Based Management Council will increase the number of children in preventive/wellness activities, including academic support services, after-school programming, and referrals to early intervention activities.
Staff development will focus on early identification and how to motivate all children to reach high standards
Partners: Auburn Enlarged City School District Cayuga County Health 
There are high percentages of students who drink, smoke, use weapons, or have weapons
1 99 9
AN NU AL
RE PORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAF ETY
21
used on them.
Widespread school-related violence is leading to exceptionally high suspension rates.
The teen pregnancy rate in Cayuga County is 10% higher than that of the state.
The Cayuga Partnership Project will provide prenatal and post-partum home visits by nurses and clinical social workers to 75 high-risk families annually as well as enhanced day care for the children.
For school-aged children, the Partnership will provide training on the relationship between mental health, substance abuse, violence in families, and violence by children.
To promote healthy lifestyles, improve educational performance, and provide alternatives to risk-taking behavior, the project will expand after-school and weekend programming.
A zero tolerance drug curriculum will be established in six middle school campuses.
A developmental program for teachers in all grades, designed to promote equal support and treatment of both low- and high-achieving students, and a program to help parents become more involved in their children's education, will be used to support educational reform.
School Resource Officers will assist in implementing school and after-school programs to reduce truancy and increase graduation, enhance non-violent conflict resolution skills, and lower alcohol and substance abuse rates.
Westbur y, N e w York
behaviors and provide referrals and follow-up.
Law enforcement officers will participate in after-school and summer programs to provide opportunities for positive interaction with students.
Yo nke rs , N e w York
Partners: Yonkers City Public Schools County and City Mental Health Department Yonkers Police Department The school district serves over 25,000 youth.
Approximately 71.2% of students are on free or reduced cost lunch.
Yonkers' crime and drug statistics are six times the rate of its wealthy Yonkers-Westchester neighbors; about 80% of the crime is drug related.
A comprehensive network, maintained by a multidisciplinary advisory council, will provide a continuum of integrated services to meet developmental needs of, and enhance resiliency factors in, children through young adulthood.
Early childhood educational efforts include providing home visits, family support, and early literacy to young children and their families, all day pre-kindergarten for all students, training staff, promoting parent involvement/education, and working with teen parents.
Alcohol/drug and violence prevention includes social skills programming in elementary schools, conflict resolution/peer mediation for all students, and student assistance counseling.
In mental health, schools will use student support teams composed of professionals and a network of coordinated case conferencing.
Safe school policies will include law enforcement partnerships to bring local police officers into schools.
Establishing or strengthening of alternative or transitional programs for middle school students, or those returning from incarceration, is included.
A nde rs on, Sou th C arolina
Partners: Board of Cooperative Educational Services of Nassau County South Shore Child Guidance Center and North Shore Childand Family Guidance Center Freeport and Westbury Police Departments The Freeport and Westbury school districts serve over 10,000 students.
Forty-four percent of all Freeport students receive free or reduced lunch.
Seventy-two percent of all Westbury students are eligible to receive free or reduced lunch.
In Freeport, 49.9% of students lived at or below the poverty line in 1995.
The project will establish and maintain comprehensive school programs and integrated community partnerships among school, community, and multidisciplinary agencies and organizations in order to build safe and drug free schools.
An early childhood program will promote psychosocial and emotional development through home visits to low-income families with young children.
Alcohol and drug use prevention and early intervention programs will involve families and communities, change their attitudes regarding substance abuse and violence, and provide students with alternatives.
Mental health care agencies in each community will provide workshops on identifying early signs of drug and alcohol use, and violent and suicidal
Partners: Anderson School District Five Anderson-Oconee-Pickens Mental Health Anderson County Sheriff 's Department Anderson School District Five serves 11,101 students, representing more than 40% of the county's school-age population.
In 1996, more than a third of the babies born in the county were born to single mothers.
In 1990, more than 21% of all children in the county lived in single-parent families, up from 10% in 1970.
The Initiative will provide increased security and will add and expand resources and services with long-term effects to ensure that children grow up in a safe, healthy atmosphere.
Early childhood development will be addressed
22
19 99
A NN UAL
RE PO RT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
by working to refine and implement an early childhood initiative targeting children ages birth to six.
A Family Resource Center will provide assessment, referrals, and follow-up for students and parents experiencing drug related problems, emotional stress, behavior concerns, or adjustment problems.
The school-based Student Assistance Program will be expanded through the services of two behavioral health counselors, and nine full-time schoolbased mental health therapists will be hired to serve all 15 schools.
Safe school policies will be strengthened by expanding the elementary alternative behavior control classes from one site to nine sites.
A safe school environment will be accomplished by training four community police officers and adding security cameras, electronic entry systems, two walk-through metal detectors, and a security assistant at each middle school.
Georg e town , Texas
Farm ing to n, Uta h
Partners: Davis County School District Davis County Mental Health and Substance Abuse Layton City Police Department The Davis County School District serves 58,903 students, and is growing at a rate of two per cent per year.
Sixty-eight different languages are spoken within the district.
A 1998-99 assessment identified overcrowded schools, lack of affordable housing, teen pregnancy, drugs, alcohol, and crime, and family violence as the highest areas of risk.
The county's youth suicide rate is four times higher than the national average.
The county also has the highest number of juvenile sex offenders in the state.
Project BRICK is designed to promote safe, drug-free, and orderly learning environments by increasing students' abilities to make positive decisions and to avoid high-risk behavior.
Prevention education in grades K-12 will include alcohol and other drug issues, anti-violence programming, and respect-building.
Each elementary school will have a Case Management Team that will intervene and assist students.
The Junior High component includes a Student Assistance Program for students who have been referred.
Prevention programming, service-learning, and careers programs also offer students opportunities to set goals and look toward the future.
School reform will expand afterschool programs for all students, not only at-risk populations.
A Family Educational Counseling Center will be established and staffed jointly with mental health and district personnel.
Norfolk/Por ts mou th , V irginia
Partners: Georgetown Independent School District Bluebonnet Trails Community Mental Health and Mental Retardation Center Georgetown Police Service Division The Georgetown Independent School District (GISD) serves 7,300 students (including 2,000 preschool students) and is located in one of the nation's five fastest growing counties.
This generally affluent suburb is also home to pockets of socio-economically-disadvantaged citizens; one in five children live in poverty and 25% of students are eligible for free or reduced price lunch.
The cornerstone of the GISD Safe Schools/Healthy Students program will be a Family Resource Center, serving 100 children and families, and the creation of a network of primary, secondary, and tertiary prevention systems through parenting, conflict resolution, mentors, and prevention curricula.
The GISD initiative will implement parent training and home visit programs.
A comprehensive approach to alcohol, other drugs, and violence prevention and intervention programming will include a researchbased curriculum, the hiring of a student services coordinator to implement programming, peer mediation and peer counseling projects, student leadership opportunities, the hiring of a full-time counselor with a speciality in substance abuse, and a community mentoring program.
School resources officers will be hired to enhance school safety initiatives that include surveillance, lighting, fencing, and crisis management.
Partners: Norfolk Norfolk Public Norfolk
Public Schools 
The Norfolk/Portsmouth project will serve 36,000 students in the Norfolk school district and 17,500 students in Portsmouth.
In Norfolk, 15% of the families are at or below the poverty level, with 63% of students receiving free or reduced cost meals.
In Portsmouth, 19% of families are at or below the poverty level, with 56% of students receiving free or reduced cost meals.
Youth in the two cities commit 26% of all homicides committed by youth statewide.
The project is a community-wide approach to creating a safe school environment, free of alcohol, drugs, and violence.
Home visits by nurses, clinical therapists and outreach workers will assess the dental, nutritional, housing,
1 999
AN NU AL
RE PORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
23
educational, employment, counseling and mental health services available to families with young children at risk for neglect.
Existing family-focused programs for first-time parents at risk for abuse or neglect or with medically high-risk pregnancies will be expanded.
An assessment of bullying in all schools will be used to design individual interventions for children identified as bullies or as victims of bullying.
Alternative school programs will be available in all the middle schools for students who are on expulsion or long-term suspension for drugs, violence, or weapons infractions.
Parent Attendance Technicians will make visits to the homes of students who are habitually truant in order work with their families.
R UR AL S ITE S De lt a Jun c tio n, Al a sk a
S ho w Low, A rizo na
Partners: Northern Arizona Academy Community Counseling Centers, Inc.
Navajo County Health Department Superior Court of Navajo County A recent survey indicates that approximately 59% of the Indian youth in Northern Arizona Academy live below the poverty level; 43% come from single parent homes; and 60% demonstrate low academic achievement.
At the largest campus (Winslow), 48% of the students have been incarcerated one or more times, and 61% are currently on probation.
Sixteen percent of the students are parents (37% of these are young mothers), and, at the time of the survey, 25% of the female students were pregnant.
The Safe Schools/Healthy Students Initiative seeks to reduce risk factors and promote a safe and drug-free environment.
The Navajo County Health Department will coordinate multiple interventions--implementing prenatal physical health home visitations, immunizations, parent training, social service linkages through referrals, and advocacy systems for students and their parents.
A registered nurse will provide home visits for mothers and infants following birth.
To address alcohol and other drug and violence prevention/intervention, several opportunities will be available: Alcoholics Anonymous and Narcotics Anonymous support groups, Big Brothers/Big Sisters, youth leadership and mentoring programs, and cultural awareness and sensitivity training.
Community Counseling Centers will provide on-site counseling and training in assessment, casework, and service delivery.
Baxley, Ge or gia
Partners: Delta/Greely School District Family Centered Services of Alaska, Inc.
State of Alaska Department of Health and Social Services, Youth Corrections The Delta/Greely School District serves 1,600 students.
In 1990, 12% of the area population had incomes below the poverty level.
Currently, 48% of students qualify for free/reduced lunches.
A comprehensive array of services, coordinated throughout the school district, will be implemented for high risk students (K-12) and their families to improve school safety, reduce or eliminate childhood risk factors before they develop into more serious problems, and better prepare students to learn.
The home-based childhood development component will serve 100 high-risk families and children.
The alcohol and drug use component provides prevention services to elementary schools and three counselors.
Specially trained aides will focus on students at high risk for developing mental health disabilities or those already identified as such.
The summer program component will include four academic/computer technology classes and two career counseling sessions.
To ensure safe school district facilities, a community probation officer will serve all youth on court-ordered probation.
Partners: Appling County Board of Education Pineland Mental Health Baxley Police Department In Appling County, over 30% of families live below the poverty line, and almost 60% of students receive free or reduced cost school lunch.
The county has no alternatives, other than suspension or expulsion, for intervening with middle and high school youth that demonstrate substantial and repeated risk behaviors.
Last year there were 2,328 inschool suspensions and 33 expulsions.
A recent community survey revealed that residents perceive teen pregnancy (54%), illegal drugs (53%) and alcohol (37%) as the three most pressing unaddressed issues for the community.
The project has three overall goals: (1) create a safer school environment for students; (2) create healthier students and families; and (3) increase and enhance school-
24
1 999
A NN UAL
RE PO RT
O N S CHOOL
SAFETY
community cooperation.
To accomplish these goals, the project will acquire two School Resource Officers, improve school security measures, enhance substance abuse and violence curriculums, develop a powerful early intervention initiative, and create an alternative education center with a focus on employability.
The project will hire four schoolbased mental health counselors, institute an expanded prekindergarten and early childhood outreach effort, develop an after-school program, provide relevant faculty and school staff training, and conduct rigorous refinement of school policy.
H ay s, Kan sa s
M ac hi as, Ma ine
Partners: Washington County Consortium for School Improvement Lubec Regional Medical Center Washington County Sheriff 's Office Rural Washington County, located in the isolated northeastern coastal area of Maine, is America's easternmost, and Maine's poorest, county.
Poverty and unemployment levels are among the highest in the nation.
Rates of homicide, suicide, domestic violence, alcohol and marijuana use are consistently among the highest in the state of Maine.
Physical and mental health services and other resources are extremely limited.
The program will focus on the highest-risk population in the total student population of 17,253.
The comprehensive program will include family outreach and counseling services; early identification, referral, and treatment for troubled children; increased substance abuse and mental health counseling; parent training; teacher training; and enhanced access for at-risk students to family support services.
Working together, school prevention coordinators, faculty, parents, and students will implement programs, such as Second Step, Kids on the Block, and Life Skills Training with the goal of preventing youth violence and substance abuse.
Intervention and counseling services will be available to students from qualified counselors contracted from local mental health agencies.
Fer ti le, Mi nn es ot a
Partners: Hays Unified Schools District #489 High Plains Mental Health Ellis County Law Enforcement The number of economically disadvantaged students in the Hays school district has increased 27% since l989.
Risk factors in the community include births to single teens (an 81% increase since l990); and a 51% increase since l996 in out-of-home placements of children age 18 and under.
Juvenile court filings have increased by 41%, including arrests for battery and for theft.
Of the DUI arrests, 29% were minors.
The graduation rate in the school district has fallen from 97% in 1997 to 87% in 1998.
To increase the quality and degree of parent involvement in schools, RURAL will engage parents and children in fun, hands-on, after-school science and math activities.
Halfprice scholarships will be provided to economically disadvantaged students in the after-school program to increase parent buy-in and reduce absenteeism.
RURAL will provide community outreach activities that will increase community awareness regarding the prevention of substance abuse and violence.
RURAL will also mobilize the community to change the current acceptance of alcohol use, and promote healthy behaviors.
RURAL will provide after school and summer school programs, a resource library, mental health consultation, service coordination (for families receiving multiple services), a learning center (for students at risk or already dropped out of school), and early intervention services.
Partners: Fertile-Beltrami Public Schools Northwestern Mental Health Center Tri-County Community Corrections The flood of 1997 had a devastating impact on families residing in rural northwestern Minnesota.
Many families already in the midst of a farming crisis were left homeless.
Five schools were condemned and three suffered major damage, resulting in a 118% school mobility rate.
The area has the third highest rate of child abuse and neglect in the state.
The area also has a 16.5% out-of-home placement rate, compared to 0.7% rate statewide.
Over one-third of all families live at or below the poverty line, and almost 40% of the students qualify for free or reduced cost lunch.
A home-based public health nursing program will reach out to at-risk mothers and teen parents to improve positive parenting skills.
School and community facilitators will oversee expanded after-school programs, match children with mentors, and institute parent/school forums.
Teachers will be trained on how to identify, and refer for individual
1999
ANNU AL
RE PORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAF ETY
25
and group therapy, seriously at-risk or severely emotionally disturbed children and adolescents.
A resource directory of family services will also be developed and distributed to allied agencies.
Teachers will be trained in resiliency and how to involve students in activities that utilize restorative justice practices.
To ensure that safe school policies are followed by all students, materials will be translated in Spanish and ongoing policy reviews will be made.
Mis s ou la , Mo nta na
Ga ll up, Ne w M exi co
Partners: Gallup-McKinley County School District Rehoboth McKinley Christian Health Care Services The Gallup Police Department The Gallup-McKinley County School District serves a student population of 14,400 students.
Roughly half the county lies within the Navajo Indian Reservation.
English is a second language for 57% of these students.
Roughly 85% of the student population qualifies for free or reduced cost lunch, and 43% of the county's residents live in poverty.
The county's unemployment rate is 11%, and on the Navajo Reservation it can exceed 40%.
To enhance early childhood development programs and mental health prevention and treatment services, a School Health Coordinator will be hired.
This person will be responsible for case management and for the overall coordination of all mental health, psychosocial, and early childhood development services rendered to students in need.
A student-focused suicide prevention program will be initiated.
After-school academic, enrichment, and physical activities will be conducted in 19 neighborhood-based elementary schools to promote drug and violence prevention and early intervention.
Culturally appropriate comprehensive school health programs will also be implemented.
A district-wide, age-appropriate, zero-tolerance discipline policy will be implemented.
School safety will be promoted through the expansion of community oriented policing services to all schools in the district, in conjunction with local law enforcement agencies.
Id ab el, Ok laho m a
Partners: Missoula County Public Schools Western Montana Mental Health Center Missoula Police Department Missoula District/Youth Court Missoula County Public Schools serves 9,214 students, 34% of whom qualify for free or reduced cost lunch.
Over the past 10 years, Missoula County has grown by 13%.
Criminal behavior, including felony assault, rape, and robbery, has increased by 53%, and incidents of domestic violence by more than 31%.
From 1993 to 1996, alcohol and other drug citations increased at a rate twice the national average, while 35% of the youth indicate life is not worth living.
School-based resource teams (SRT), school personnel, youth prevention specialists, family advocates, school resource officers, mental health specialists, and youth probation officers, will provide a coordinated and comprehensive network of outreach, assessment, prevention, intervention, linkage, and referral for students and their families.
This initiative will enhance the capacity of "Neighborhood Nurses" to provide critical home-visiting services to at-risk families in targeted areas.
The initiative will also use Even Start team members to provide family literacy programs, pre-school, and enhanced daycare for atrisk families.
For elementary, middle, and high school students, the initiative will increase after-school activities, summer programming, and school-community interaction.
A Youth Probation Officer working with the SRT will facilitate transitions for students returning to school from a juvenile justice placement.
Flexible alternative educational programs will be in place to help at-risk students achieve success.
Partners: Idabel Public Schools Carl Albert Mental Health McCurtain County Sheriff 's Department Almost 10,000 people reside in Idabel, with 1,704 students enrolled in the Idabel Public Schools.
Almost 70% qualify for free or reduced school lunch.
Over the past three years, incidents of student drug use and student violence have increased steadily.
As a result, last year, almost twice as many students were suspended or expelled from school than in the previous two years.
Community members and leaders will develop and implement plans to address minority issues, domestic violence, economic development, Native American needs, safe schools, drug and violence prevention, family wellness, early childhood needs, and school improvement.
At the core of these efforts is training on communication, prob-
26
19 99
A NN UAL
REPO RT O N
SCHOOL
SAFETY
lem-solving, life skills, and early identification of problem behaviors.
The initiative will expand its current early childhood efforts to reach more families with children ages birth to three.
A culturally specific curriculum and a rites-of-passage program will also be part of the educational reform efforts.
Recreational needs of students will be met through after-school programs and a ROPES course for children ages ten and up.
An extended day program and expanded student assistance services will help students with disruptive behavior or psychological and mental health needs.
School security will be enhanced through additional security staff, truancy enforcement, and policy revisions.
Re d mond , O regon
Newpor t, Rh o de I sl a nd
Partners: Newport Public Schools Rhode Island Department for Children, Youth 
Of the student population, 2% receive "English as a Second Language" and/or bilingual education, and 20% receive some level of special education.
Fifty-five percent of lowincome Newport public school students participate in the School Breakfast Program.
The teen suicide and pregnancy rates are significantly higher than the state averages.
Six teams will provide a coordinated set of prevention, education, intervention, and support services.
New and existing nurse home visitation services will link with early intervention programs, emergency family services, Head Start, Even Start, and others, to strengthen supports to high-risk families with young children, as well as high-risk mothers prior to the birth of a child.
In addition to expanded school-based family service coordination, reading skills support will be increased, and intensive transition services for children between pre-school and grade school, and elementary and middle school, will be provided.
A community-wide mediation program, classroom-based educational programs aimed at decreasing youth violence and substance abuse, a teen hotline, recreational after-school programs, and parent seminars will be implemented.
Taze we l l, Tennessee
Partners: Crook Deschutes Education Service District Deschutes County Commission on Children and Families District Attorney's Office The Crook Deschutes Education Service District is composed of three school districts, serving 20,000 students in grades K-12.
Total juvenile crime in the district increased by 38% between 1987 and 1996.
The overall suspension and expulsion rate is alarming and consistent.
Other serious indicators include a 134% increase from 1990 to 1998 in students referred to probation, a rise in the number of students in juvenile justice placements, and child abuse and neglect cases.
Project goals are to reduce violence in local schools; to reduce the incidence of alcohol, tobacco, and other drug use among youth; to increase student access to mental health/health services; and to increase school completion/ graduation rates.
Project objectives are to increase law enforcement presence in schools; to expand public awareness of the county's Safe Schools Alliance policies and goals; to establish mentoring opportunities for at-risk youth and after-school skill-based recreational opportunities for middle school youth; and to increase the number of school-based Family Access Network sites.
The project also seeks to expand the "First Step to Success" early childhood development program; to provide comprehensive schoolbased mental health assessment and treatment services; to provide training for school staff in early identification of problem behaviors; and to conduct a countywide policy study and site assessments.
Partners: Clinch-Powell Educational Cooperative Frontier Health and Cherokee Health Claiborne, Grainger, Hancock, Hawkins, and Union County Police Departments In the Clinch-Powell area of Tennessee, area school districts have formed a five-county educational cooperative that serves 18,342 students.
One of the counties, Hancock County, is the seventh poorest in the nation.
Designated a manpower shortage area, Hancock County has no hospitals, three physicians, and one dentist.
The percentage of people living in poverty is 34%, compared to 15% nationwide.
Beginning with preschool age children, counselors will provide services, referral, and consultation for those exhibiting problematic behavior.
The school system will link with the Tennessee Early Intervention System to assess and refer children ages birth to three to appropriate services.
Elementary school children will receive preventive services, intervention, and referral for treatment from child
1999
ANNU AL
RE PORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAF ETY
27
development specialists.
Community service agencies will link with the school systems to assess family-related issues including alcohol and other drug use.
Middle and high school children will have access to mental health counselors and school resource officers.
Home school visitors, who are trained social workers, will coordinate with school-based services to ensure continuity between behavior management plans at school and home.
School safety strategies will include partnerships with local law enforcement officers and school facility and security measures.
H am li n, We st V irginia
L ar ami e , W yoming
Partners: Albany County School District #1 Laramie Police Department Southeast Wyoming Mental Health Center Laramie, a small town of approximately 25,000 people, is the third largest city in Wyoming.
Albany County Public Schools had 3,888 students enrolled as of April 1998.
Since 1994, some decreases in drug use have been noted for 7th, 8th and 11th graders.
However, the percentage of 10th and 12th graders in the high-risk group remains high.
Albany County has the second highest dropout rate in the state.
The goal of the Laramie Community Safe Schools/ Healthy Students Initiative is to provide a community-wide system to: (1) increase the social skills level and prosocial development of all the children in the Laramie community; (2) identify children who are at risk for problem behavior and promptly place them into effective services; and (3) intervene with children who are engaging in negative behaviors and apply an accountability-based, restorative justice model to their treatment/rehabilitation.
The Initiative will intervene with high-risk families prior to the birth of a child to prevent poor parenting and child maltreatment; identify high-risk pregnancies and provide parent training; identify at-risk children, based on the risk factors of disciplinary action, drop in grades, drug use and disengagement from school, and provide appropriate evidence-based services during the crisis; offer high-risk youth and their families a service team designed to meet their needs; increase the range of sentencing options, with adequate monitoring for all options, provide comprehensive substance abuse treatment for adolescents; and identify potential violent offenders sooner in order to provide appropriate interventions.
TRIBAL SITES Pi non , Ar i zona
Partners: Lincoln County Board of Education Prestera Center for Mental Health Services, Inc. and Action Youth Care Lincoln County Sheriff 's Office Lincoln County is a chronically depressed rural county in southwestern West Virginia.
A 1997-1998 survey indicated that over 25% of the student population had used illegal drugs and drank to the point of intoxication two weeks prior to the survey.
The school reports that student suspensions, truancy, safe school violations, child protective services cases, and juvenile court referrals are continuing to increase.
At least 157 students ages 6-17 have being identified with emotional and behavioral disorders.
The primary goal of the Lincoln Early Aggression Prevention Program (LEAAP) is to provide support and prevention programs for families to address social, emotional and physical needs of preschool and elementary students.
Three new preschool programs will be implemented to involve parents and children in developmental activities designed to prepare the child for successful entry into school.
All seven elementary schools participating in LEAAP will have leadership teams coordinated by an in-school social worker.
These teams will develop programming and interventions to prevent and reduce student drug use and violence.
A mentoring coordinator will link children with mentors.
Teachers will be trained on how to identify youth with mental health problems and how to refer those students to specialized services provided by the consortium partners.
Students that continue to be a disruptive presence in the classroom will be removed and placed in alternative learning classes.
To enhance school safety, school resource officers will be a visible presence on campus.
Partners: Pinon Unified School District #4 Chinle Department of Behavioral Health Services Navajo Department of Law Enforcement The Pinon School District consists of seven small Navajo communities with a population of about 5,000 people.
Only 19% of residents over 16 are employed, and the median household income is less than 20% of the rest of the nation.
Ninety-two percent of students live below the poverty level and receive free/reduced cost lunches.
The initiative calls for the design and implementation of an array of services including prenatal physical and mental
28
19 99
A NN UAL
RE PO RT
O N S CHOOL
SAFETY
health services, and the creation of a family resource center at the school district for drug and violence education.
The initiative will also meet student mental health needs through screening and counseling; continuation of sweat lodges by a Medicine man for boys, and an elder woman for girls, to provide culturally appropriate healing ceremonies; the redesign and improvement of the school mental health referral system; the implementation of the K'ei Program offered by the Indian Health Service, which provides mental health services integrated with traditional Navajo healing; and active participation by mental health agencies in providing parent education services and intervention programs during school-sponsored family outreach programs.
Education reform will continue through staff development based on effective teaching and learning principles; the reduction of class sizes at all levels, especially the primary grades; the hiring of tutors; and a comprehensive English literacy program for grades pre-K to 12.
W in d R i ve r I nd ian R es er va ti on, Et het e, Wyoming
Partners: Wyoming Indian Schools Indian Health Service Wind River Office of Law Enforcement Services The Wyoming Indian Schools is a small K-12 school district on the Wind River Indian Reservation in West Central Wyoming.
There is a high prevalence of drug use and arrests, and excessive rates of suicide, homicide, juvenile delinquency, and accidental death.
Existing early intervention programs do not adequately meet the needs of the youth.
The Indian Health Service is the only non-reservation provider of mental health services, and can only serve 40 percent of children and families in need.
The program will use the services of health care educators, practitioners, social workers, counselors, psychologists, grandparent advisors, and school resource officers.
They will work as a team out of the Intergenerational Family Resource Help Center to provide prevention and intervention programs focusing on the mental and emotional health of the preschool population.
These programs will seek to reduce gangs and violence, and incorporate anti-violence and anti-drug curricula throughout the school and community.
The Intergenerational Family Resource Help Center will also coordinate and increase the provision of mental health services.
A school resource officer will forge the needed link between tribal law enforcement and the school.
1999
ANNUAL
REPORT ON
SCH OOL
SAF ETY
29
Model Programs CHAPTER 3
This chapter pre sen ts ex amp les of prevent ion pr ogra ms t ha t work--prog rams that are well de signe d, have demonstrated ef fectiveness, and ca n be implemented as par t of a compreh ensive schoo l safe ty plan.
Th e pro grams cited in this cha pter were identifie d under a U .S. Dep ar tme nt of Justice g rant to the H amilto n F ish N at io nal In sti tu te on S chool an d Co mmuni ty Violence in collabora tion with the Univ ersi ty of Mar yla nd a nd To bler Research Associate s.
While sev era l of t he most ef fecti ve pr ograms are broad i n scope, the progra ms should be viewed as componen ts of a comprehe nsi ve school safety p lan rather th an as separate , a ll-i nclusiv e strategies.
It is impor tant to remember tha t safe sc hools are the p roduct of care ful plan ning and at te nti on to physica l, social, a nd cultural envi ronme nt s.
A crit ical component of incre asing sch ool safet y i s cho osin g programs that can be rea dily integ rated with other a cti vit ies to eff ect ive ly address local needs.
I t i s impe rative th at sch ools sele ct pr ogra ms and stra te gi es b ase d on r esu lts of a t horoug h ne ed s a ssessment.
A lso, community stak ehol ders must be actively involv ed in de velop ing and imp lementi ng the comprehensive school saf et y plan.
The p rograms include d in this chapt er ar e inten de d to comp lement, n ot repla ce, tho se prog rams provided in last y ear's Annual Repor t.
Not su rpri sin gly, some of the progra ms are the same, but a ye ar's wor th of ad di tion al lear ni ng h as allo wed the id en tification of new, ef fectiv e p rograms.
1 99 9 AN NUAL REPORT ON SCHOOL SAFETY
31
The data presented in this chapter are drawn from three ongoing studies of school-based efforts to prevent and reduce poor youth outcomes.
The studies focus on programs designed to reduce substance use, anti-social and violent behavior, and problem behavior in general.
The programs have been formally evaluated using school-aged children in school settings, and a comparison group design.
They are among the most effective programs examined to date in attaining good outcomes for youth.
It should be noted that many more programs were analyzed than are included in the current rankings.
Supplemental information on the analyses that generated the programs included in this chapter is available from the Hamilton Fish National Institute on School and Community Violence (www.hamfish.org).
The programs presented in this chapter have been rigorously evaluated in the field.
Programs listed have been ranked among the top 50 percent in terms of strong program effects by at least one of three groups of researchers.
Some of the programs have been tested in multiple sites, while others have been implemented in only a single school.
In choosing an appropriate intervention for inclusion in a comprehensive school safety plan, it is important to recognize the need to adapt a program to specific school environments.
The conditions and populations in which programs have been tested can be quite different from those in which the program is to be adapted.
Additionally, schools serve ethnically and economically diverse student populations, populations that may differ from those tested.
While fidelity to a tested, theory-based program is important to maintaining program effect, research also shows that tailoring a program to address cultural differences in student populations, can increase its effectiveness.
Accordingly, selection and replication of demonstrated programs should be based on the goals, objectives, needs, and available resources identified in the comprehensive school safety plan, adapting the programs as necessary, while maintaining the integrity of their original design.
Assessing the effectiveness of these adapted strategies is essential.
P RO G RA M D ESC RI PT IO NS
V iolence Prevention Programs
Anger Coping Program The Anger Coping Program is designed to provide cognitive behavioral training to preadolescent and early adolescent youth (i.e., 8 to 14 years old), but is also appropriate in an adapted form for younger children and older adolescents.
The program is structured for use with groups of children in which two co-leaders administer modeling, role-playing, group problem-solving, and positive reinforcement activities, including a reward reinforcement system for goal achievement.
It is recommended that one of the two coleaders be a site-based school psychologist or school counselor.
In general, groups meet for 12 or, in the updated version, 18 weeks, once per week, for 60 to 90 minutes.
In the evaluated sample, fourth, fifth, and sixth grade boys, identified by their teachers as the most aggressive and disruptive at school, were selected as participants.
Students were involved with the program for a period of 12-18 weeks and exhibited 30% fewer antisocial and violent behaviors following participation in the program relative to a comparison group.
The sample included both White and African-American students.
C on ta c t in for m a t i o n : J o hn Loc h m an , Ph .D. D e p a r t m ent o f Ps y c ho log y U ni v er si t y o f Al ab a ma Bo x 8 70 34 8 Tu s c a l o os a , A L 3 5 4 8 7 Te l : ( 2 0 5 ) 3 4 8 - 5 0 8 3 F a x: ( 2 05 ) 3 48 - 8 64 8 E - m a i l: j l o c h m a n @ g p . a s. u a . e d u
BrainPower Program The BrainPower Program is a retraining intervention designed to reduce peer-directed aggression.
The treatment is a 12-lesson cognitive intervention with materials and activities appropriate for the late elementary grades.
The primary goal of the intervention is to train aggressive boys not to infer hostile peer intent in negative social encounters.
The program contains three components.
The first component strengthens aggressive boys' ability to detect with accuracy the intent of others.
The second component is designed to increase the likelihood that aggressive boys will assume nonhostile intent when negative social encounters are ambiguous.
The third component elaborates on the meaning of intentionality in the context of linking appropriate behavioral responses to ambiguously caused, negative outcomes.
32
1999
ANN UAL
R E P O RT
ON SCHOOL
SA FETY
Abington Senior High School Abington, Pennsylvania High School, Grades 10-12 Town
Sc ho ol S afe t y Fo c us :
Str ong School, Parent, and Community Collaboration Student Focused Instruction Strategies Parent and Youth Support Program Student Assistance Program Peer Mediation
C o nta ct I n for m a t i o n :
Robert M. Burt, Principal Abington Senior High School 900 Highland Avenue Abington, PA 19001 (215) 884-4700 x2360 (phone) (215) 886-1871 (fax) www.abington.k12.pa.us/srhigh
In Abington, Pennsylvania, community members and school personnel have been concerned about students' after-school alcohol and drug use.
As a result, Abington developed a comprehensive, long-term prevention program to serve students from kindergarten through high school graduation.
Abington Senior High School's program is built around early prevention and includes programs that begin in the early elementar y years and continually build upon previous knowledge throughout future grade levels.
Prevention programming begins with building a strong social skill foundation among students through a series of lessons on decision-making skills, resistance, and refusal skills.
At higher grade levels, these skills are infused with prevention education in multiple areas including awareness of tobacco, drug, and violence issues.
A key prevention component of Abington Senior High School's prevention strategy is the infusion of anti-drug and violence messages in the curriculum and instruction program.
Science, health, physical education, and family and consumer science courses all include lessons about the significant consequences of tobacco, drug, and alcohol involvement.
Teachers utilize in-ser vice time to help identify and implement best practices in guiding students and giving them effective means for interacting with all members of the school community.
The drug and violence prevention program is supported with effective discipline policies.
Each year, students receive a Student Handbook outlining the standards of appropriate conduct and the sanctions for violation of the school code.
For student suspensions due to fighting, the principal conducts an informal hearing complete with due process rights.
Suspension hearings always include the student involved, their parents, the assistant principal, a guidance counselor, and the community-policing officer assigned to the school.
To help identify and respond to students who demonstrate drug and alcohol involvement, Abington High School has created a Student Assistance Program (SAP).
Members of the SAP team are thoroughly trained in appropriate inter vention strategies and in developing informed and stratified approaches that include parents, the school team, and mental health providers.
Abington Senior High School has reported a decrease in student suspensions from 14 drug/alcohol offenses, 38 fights, and two weapon offenses in 1993-94, to six drug/alcohol offenses, 14 fights, and zero weapon offenses in 1997-98.
19 99
ANNUAL
REPORT
ON
SCHO OL
SAFE TY
33
The BrainPower Program is conducted as a school-based program of small group instruction.
Students are seen on a pull-out basis during the course of the regular school day.
Groups of six students meet twice weekly in 60-minute sessions for a total of 12 sessions.
Each group should consist of four excessively aggressive and two average, nonaggressive students.
Those involved in the program were in grades three through six and were primarily African-American and Latino students from an urban setting.
The participants received instruction one or two times per week for six weeks and exhibited from 12 to 20% fewer antisocial and violent behaviors relative to the comparison group after the program period ended.
C on t a c t i n f o rm a t i o n : C y n t h i a H u d l e y, P h .
D .
G ra d u a t e S c h o o l o f E d u c a t i o n U ni v er s i ty o f C al if o r ni a at Sa n ta Ba r bar a 2 21 0 P h el ps Ha ll UC SB S an t a B ar ba r a, CA 93 1 0 6- 94 90 Te l : ( 8 0 5 ) 8 9 3 - 8 3 2 4 F ax: ( 80 5) 89 3- 72 64 E-m ai l: h ud l ey@ ed uca t i on .u cs b . edu
Effects of the Good Behavior Game were measured by teacher ratings, peer nomination, and independent observations in the classrooms.
All three evaluation methods showed positive effects for both males and females by the end of first grade, compared to children in the control group.
During a nine-month followup, teacher ratings exhibited a 10-percent reduction while peer nominations exhibited a 19-percent reduction in aggressive behavior.
By middle school, evaluations found positive results for males who had displayed early aggressive behavior in first grade.
The Good Behavior Game also had measurable effects on the initiation of smoking among males.
The sixth grade program youth had a prevalence rate that was six percent lower for tobacco use than nonprogram youth.
The program was evaluated for African-American and White students in an urban setting.
Con t a ct in f orm ati on : S h e p p a r d G. K e lla m D e p a r t m e n t o f Me n t a l H y g i e n e J o h n s H o p k i n s U n i v e r s i t y S c h o ol o f Hy g ie n e an d P ub li c He al th P r ev e n ti o n Re se a rc h C en t er M a s o n F. L o r d B u i l d i n g , S u i t e 5 0 0 5 20 0 Ea s te r n Av en ue B a l t i m o r e , MD 2 1 2 2 4 Te l : ( 4 1 0 ) 5 5 0 - 3 4 4 5
Good Behavior Game The Good Behavior Game (GBG), for children in the first grade, aims at reducing early aggressive and shy behaviors.
The program improves the teacher's ability to define tasks, set rules, and discipline students.
At the beginning of the game, children are assigned to teams by their teacher who makes sure that teams contain equal numbers of aggressive/disruptive children and social isolates.
Students work in teams in such a way that the individual is responsible to the rest of the group.
The teacher then clearly defines a set of disruptive behaviors, which if displayed, will result in a team receiving a demerit.
At the end of the game, those teams that have not exceeded the maximum number of demerits are rewarded with tangible rewards or rewarding activities, whereas those teams that have exceeded the maximum are not rewarded.
Because the program seeks to modify the behavior of shy children without labeling them as such, shy children are often appointed Team Leader with the responsibility for handing out prizes.
After the students become used to the rules of the game, the teacher begins the game with no warning, so that students are always aware of their own behavior.
I Can Problem Solve: An Interpersonal Cognitive ProblemSolving Program I Can Problem Solve (ICPS) serves as an effective violence prevention program by helping children think of nonviolent ways to solve everyday problems.
It has proven to be extremely effective in helping children learn to resolve interpersonal problems and prevent antisocial behaviors.
ICPS is a cognitive approach that teaches children how to think, not what to think.
They learn that behavior has causes, that people have feelings, and that there is more than one way to solve a problem.
As they learn to associate how they think with what they do, children become more caring and better able to share, cooperate, and get along with others.
ICPS is available in separate volumes for three developmental levels: preschool, kindergarten and primary grades, and intermediate elementary grades.
The program can be easily incorporated into the classroom or adapted for use by counselors.
The curriculum involves formal lessons, interaction in the classroom, and integration into the curriculum.
34
1 999
AN NU AL
REPORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFE TY
Linwood Elementary School Robins Air Force Base, Georgia Elementar y School, Grades Pr e-K­6 390 students Rural
Sc ho ol S af et y Fo c us :
Schoolwide Discipline Plan Self-esteem and Self-discipline Programs Mentoring Program After-school Tutoring Program Strong Staff Commitment and Infor mation Sharing Focus on Parental and Community Involvement
Co nta ct I nf or m a t i o n :
Theresa Schr eck, Principal Linwood Elementar y School 1050 Education Way, Building 3802 Robins AFB, Geor gia 31098-1043 (912) 926-5745 (phone) (912) 926-0525 (fax)
Concerned with the amount of time spent responding to classroom disruptions and discipline problems, faculty at Linwood Elementar y School developed a comprehensive strategy to help improve student behavior.
The school's Discipline Committee identified a need to improve student courtesy and respect, as well as inter-personal relationships.
After researching and reviewing various discipline plans and strategies, the Committee implemented the Linwood Pride Discipline Plan: Making Responsible Choices to help students take responsibility for their own actions.
Developed by teachers, students, and parents, the Linwood Pride Discipline Plan aims to teach students responsible decision making.
Students are consistently reminded of the underlying theme of the Discipline Plan-- "We believe in you.
We trust you.
We know you can do it."
The program's philosophy is based on several premises: each person is a responsible decision maker; each person makes many choices every day; each person decides how to behave; no one else causes a person to do anything, and each person chooses success or failure.
If a student does not make responsible choices, they visit the Opportunity Room--a designated room for students to think about their decisions, discuss what occurred, and develop an action plan for the next time they are placed in a similar situation.
A trained school counselor works closely with each student to provide support and to determine when students need additional services, such as mentoring, counseling, or designing an individual behavior plan.
Linwood Elementar y School has created a school climate that is highly conducive to the learning process and academic achievement.
Students and staff members constantly reinforce the school's vision and mission statement, "Children should be accepting of and compassionate toward others."
A full-time nurse and guidance counselor supplement and complement the work of the classroom teacher in creating a nur turing and safe environment.
Parental involvement is encouraged through active recruiting in school newsletters, flyers, and invitations to eat lunch with their children at school.
A Parent Resource Center offers parents the opportunity to work on projects for teachers, read with children, and participate in small group discussions on student issues.
During the 1997-98 school year, parent volunteers logged in 5,180 hours of ser vice to the school, a 25% increase from the previous year.
Each year the school discipline plan is evaluated.
The percentage of students demonstrating acceptable behavior increased from 84% in the 1996-97 school year to 92% in 1997-98.
Furthermore, the percentage of students referred to the Opportunity Room fell from 29% to 16% during the same period.
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
35
Based on more than 20 years of research, researchers have observed a substantial improvement in behavioral adjustment attributable to the program.
Importantly, youngsters not showing behavior problems in preschool were less likely to begin showing them later.
Evaluators observed a 56 to 62% reduction (during the followup evaluations) in problem behaviors of the 113 trained prekindergarten and kindergarten, inner-city children, compared to the 106 children in the control group.
C on ta ct in for m a t i o n : M y rn a Sh ure , P h .D .
M C P Hah n em a nn U n iv er s i ty Te l : ( 2 1 5 ) 7 6 2 - 7 2 0 5 E -m ai l: m sh ur e @ d r e xe l. e d u O r d e r i n g In f o r m a t i o n : R e s e a r ch P re s s 2 6 1 2 N o r t h M a t t i s Av e n u e Ch am p ai gn , I L 61 8 2 2 -10 53 Te l : ( 8 0 0 ) 5 1 9 - 2 7 0 7 F ax: ( 21 7) 35 2- 12 21 E - m a i l : r p @ re s e a rc h p re s s . c o m w w w. re s e a rc h p re s s . c o m
Each Kid Power Program is presented by a counselor who is experienced and trained in mental health and substance abuse and who brings a diversified background of experience working with children.
Each counselor serves approximately 20 children in grades one through five "full time" for the first program semester.
Each participant receives weekly individual and group counseling with maximum assistance provided to the family as needed and as their individual cooperation permits.
Second semester Kid Power enrollees are considered "part time" and each child receives group counseling, varying from weekly to monthly, depending on the needs of the individual student.
The majority of students in the program are white males.
The students received the program three or four times per week for 18 weeks.
After the program, participating students exhibited 40% fewer antisocial and violent behaviors relative to a comparison group.
C on ta c t i n for m a t i o n : M i ke B e nn e tt R i v er R e gi on H u man Se r v ic es , Inc .
6 60 P ar k St r e e t Ja ck s on v il l e, FL 32 20 4 Te l : ( 9 0 4 ) 3 5 9 - 2 6 8 0 , e x t .
1 1 5 F ax : ( 90 4) 35 9- 26 95 E- m ai l: r rh s m i k e @ m s n . c o m
Kid Power Program The Kid Power Program is a school-based prevention and intervention program for elementary schools, funded by the Florida Department of Children and Families.
The Kid Power model is designed to prevent multiple-risk students from becoming involved with alcohol and other drugs and from being violent.
Each Kid Power program provides individual and group preventive counseling, events, and activities for the students and their families.
Additionally, counselors serve as resource persons for alcohol, tobacco, and other drug use prevention and intervention services within their schools.
Students who display risk factors that research has shown to be associated with substance abuse behavior are selected after a screening process involving the Kid Power counselor, students, parents, and school personnel.
Selected participants are those most likely to demonstrate academic and social gains through a program promoting healthy peer interaction, positive school experiences, and preventive counseling sessions.
Metropolitan Area Child Study The Metropolitan Area Child Study (MACS) is a multicomponent violence and substance use prevention program that also aims to enhance and support prosocial behavior and academic achievement.
This program seeks to affect the child's thinking and behavior, while also affecting the major influences on development (teachers, peers, and parents).
As presently configured, three levels of intervention can be implemented.
The most basic program combines teacher training in classroom behavior management and instructional techniques with a classroom-based social-skills, social problem-solving curriculum (20 weeks over two years).
A 20-session, small-group component for children with above average risk for aggression can also be added.
This component is delivered through weekly sessions with six to eight children.
A third component involves families in 22 weekly meetings.
The program has been designed to be implemented in elementary schools with one version focused on second and third grades and one on fifth and sixth grades.
Skills training in the general curriculum and the small group include social skills, perspective taking, conflict resolution, and managing media violence.
The family meetings focus on parenting practices, managing development, and aiding in
36
1 99 9
AN NU AL
REPORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
reducing individual, family, and community risk factors for drug abuse, school failure, and violence.
The strongest effects have been found when the three components are implemented as an integrated intervention.
The program was developed with a multiethnic, economically disadvantaged population.
It has been subjected to extensive and careful evaluation.
The full/integrated program has shown effectiveness in reducing aggression, improving academic functioning, and lessening rates of later delinquency.
African-American and Latino students in an urban setting received instruction continuously for two school years.
Those students in grades two through six who received instruction exhibited 40% fewer antisocial and violent behaviors than comparable students not receiving the program.
C o n t a c t i n f o rm a t i o n : P a t ri c k H .
To l a n P h .
D .
I n s t i t u t e f o r J u v e n il e R e s e a r c h D e p a r t me n t o f Ps yc hi a t r y U n iv e rs it y o f Il l in o is a t Ch ic a go C h ic ag o , IL 60 61 2 Te l : ( 3 1 2 ) 4 1 3 - 1 8 9 3 F a x : (3 12 ) 4 13 -17 0 3 E - m a i l : To l a n @ u i c . e d u
An evaluation of the program included students of mixed ethnicity in an urban setting who exhibited a 19% reduction in antisocial and violent behaviors.
C o n tac t i n fo r m a t i o n : D o n na C r aw fo r d, Exe cut i ve Di re c t o r N a ti on al Ce n ter f or C o nfl ic t R es o l ut i on E du ca t i on 1 1 0 We s t M a i n S t r e e t Ur b an a , I L 61 8 0 1 Te l : ( 2 1 7 ) 3 8 4 - 4 1 1 8 F a x : (2 1 7) 38 4- 43 22 E - m a i l : c r a w f o rd @ n c c re . o r g w w w. n c c re . o rg O r de ri n g I n for mat i on : R e s e a r c h Pr e s s 2 6 12 No r th M at ti s A v e n u e C h am pa i gn , I L 6 18 22 -1 0 5 3 Te l : ( 8 0 0 ) 5 1 9 - 2 7 0 7 F a x : (2 1 7 ) 3 5 2 - 1 2 2 1 E - m a i l : r p @ re s e a rc h p re s s . c o m w w w. re s e a rc h p re s s . c o m
Positive Adolescent Choices Training The Positive Adolescent Choices Training (PACT) program is designed to reduce the chances that at-risk adolescents will become victims or perpetrators of violence.
It addresses the problem of expressive violence, which involves loss of control among family, friends, and acquaintances, and represents the greatest threat to adolescents.
Although developed especially for sensitivity to the needs of African-American youth, the techniques used in the program are applicable to, and are frequently used with, multiethnic groups.
PACT primarily targets high-risk youth between the ages of 12 and 16 who are selected by teachers on the basis of skill deficiencies in relating to peers, behavior problems (particularly aggression), and/or a history of violence, victimization, or exposure to violence.
PACT helps adolescents learn more appropriate and socially effective ways of interacting with others, how to recognize and control angry emotions that can interfere with verbal resolutions to conflict, and how to understand and avoid violence risk.
Training takes place in small groups of no more than 10, targeting skills that include giving constructive criticism (expressing criticism or displeasure calmly), receiving negative feedback (reacting appropriately to criticism and anger of others), and negotiating (identifying problems and potential solutions and learning to compromise).
Peer Mediation Program This program is one important component of a comprehensive school-based conflict resolution program.
In this program, students in grades 6-12 are selected based on nominations by faculty, staff, and students to receive peer mediation training, preparing them to serve as neutral mediators who assist other students in resolving conflict situations.
The suggested basic peer mediation training takes approximately 12 to 15 hours over two days and includes activities related to understanding conflict, responses to conflict, origins of conflict, communications skills, the role of the mediator, and the mediation process.
In addition, subsequent biweekly meetings incorporate more advanced activities, addressing bias awareness, social and cultural diversity, advanced communication, dealing with anger, caucusing, negotiating, and group problem solving.
Program materials include a program guide, a student manual, and an optional training video.
The program also includes training workshops and activities for staff, students, parents, and communities.
19 99
ANNUA L
REP ORT ON
SCHO OL
SAFE TY
37
The curriculum features lessons one or two times per week for 19 weeks.
Students receiving instruction reduced antisocial and violent behaviors by 38%.
C on ta ct in for m a t i o n : B e t t y R .
Yu n g , P h .
D .
S ch o o l o f P ro f es s ion al Psy c ho l og y Wr ig h t St a te Uni v er s i ty El l is H um a n D ev el o pm en t Ins t it ut e 9 N .
E dw in C .
M ose s B o ul e va rd Da yt on , OH 45 40 7 Te l : ( 9 3 7 ) 7 7 5 - 4 3 0 0 F ax : ( 9 37 ) 7 75 - 43 2 3 E - m a i l : b e t t y. y u n g @ w r i g h t . e d u O r d e r i n g In f o r m a t i o n : Research Press 2 6 1 2 N o r t h M a t t i s Av e n u e C ham pai gn , I L 6 18 22 -1 05 3 Te l : ( 8 0 0 ) 5 1 9 - 2 7 0 7 F ax : ( 21 7) 35 2- 12 21 E - m a i l : r p @ re s e a rc h p re s s . c o m w w w. re s e a rc h p re s s . c o m
steps: (1) describing what you want; (2) describing how you feel; (3) explaining the reasons underlying those wants and feelings; (4) reversing perspectives; (5) inventing optional agreements for mutual gain; and (6) reaching an integrative agreement.
The students are also taught a four-step mediation procedure: (1) ending hostility; (2) ensuring commitment to mediation; (3) facilitating negotiations; and (4) formalizing the agreement.
Evaluators observed a reduction in antisocial and violent behaviors of 63% in students who participated in the program, compared with students who did not participate.
C on t a c t i n f o rm a t i o n : L i nda J oh ns on I n t e r a c t i o n B o o k Co m p a n y 72 08 C or ne l i a Dr i ve E d in a, M N 5 54 3 5 Te l : ( 6 1 2 ) 8 3 1 - 7 0 6 0 F ax: (6 1 2) 83 1- 9 3 32
Think First The Think First program is an anger and aggression management training for secondary level students.
The program trains students in anger-control and problem-solving skills through extensive use of role-playing and modeling techniques.
A reward system is used to promote attendance and completion of homework assignments.
The program contains ten 50-minute curricular sessions designed to be spread over a minimum of 12 weeks.
Think First places exclusive emphasis on the management of school-related anger and aggression.
Video examples produced in a large urban high school show typical classroom and hallway encounters involving student to student and student to teacher.
The program was evaluated with a group of 47 middle school students from an urban setting.
Program participants had a 29% success rate differential over nonparticipants in self-reported aggression and a 5% success rate differential in teacher reported aggressive behavior.
A significant difference was also found in number of office referrals for disciplinary problems.
C on t a c t i n f o rm a t i o n : Ji m L ar s o n, P h .D. C o o rd i n a t o r, S c h o o l P s y c h o l o g y P r o g r a m D e p a r t m e n t o f P s y c h o l og y U ni v er s it y o f Wi s co n sin - W hi te wa ter W h i t e w a t e r, W I 5 3 1 9 0 Te l : ( 4 1 4 ) 4 7 2 - 5 4 1 2 F a x: ( 4 14 ) 4 72 - 1 86 3
Teaching Students to be Peacemakers "Teaching Students To Be Peacemakers" is a resource that shows teachers how they can encourage students to resolve disagreements peacefully.
A book of the same name contains many practical strategies as well as specific suggestions to teach conflict resolution procedures and skills to students.
During the training program for "Teaching Students To Be Peacemakers," participants learn how to establish a peer mediation program as a classroom and school discipline program.
Students are taught what is and is not a conflict, how to negotiate integrative agreements, and how to mediate schoolmates' conflicts.
The peer mediation program is established and the role of mediator is rotated so that every student serves as mediator an equal amount of time.
Participants learn how to infuse the conflict resolution training into different subject areas.
Students are given a copy of My Mediation Notebook containing lessons from Teaching Students to be Peacemakers.
The program consists of cooperative learning procedures such as: procedural learning, role-playing, drill and review exercises, and small group discussion.
The students are taught a negotiation procedure consisting of six
38
1 999
AN NU AL
REPORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFE TY
C.W. Otto Middle School Lansing, M ichigan Middle School, Grades 6-8 Urban
Sc hoo l S afe ty F oc u s:
Peace Center Program School Nor ms Against Violence, Aggr ession, and Bullying Strong Mentoring Program Focus on Early Inter vention and Persistent Problem Behaviors
C o nta ct In for m a t i o n :
Walker Beverly, Principal C.W. Otto Middle School 500 East Thomas Street Lansing, MI 48906 (517) 325-6574 (phone) (517) 325-7478 (fax)
In 1994, the Mayor of Lansing identified youth violence as a major problem and called for the formation of a coalition of local government, law enforcement, public schools, prevention agencies, and representatives from the community.
The coalition examined community sur vey data that suggested increases in school discipline problems and suspensions, particularly for fighting and dropouts.
According to risk assessment data, the greatest increase among the selected indicators was early initiation and persistent problem behaviors.
In response, the Youth Violence Prevention Coalition developed a comprehensive, multi-faceted strategy to address identified problems.
At Otto Middle School, the prevention strategy included creation of The Peace Center.
Peace Center activities include peer mediation, an afterschool community service and violence prevention club, a Parent Partner program offering support resources and classes for parents throughout the school year.
In addition, the Center provides transition activities for students preparing to enter middle school and those students preparing to leave for high school.
The creation of a school culture of nonviolence has been one of the most noticeable changes at Otto.
At Otto, "Power for Living" is a required course for all eighth graders.
The curriculum used for the course provides a systematic approach to substance abuse and violence prevention education and is taught by a curriculum-certified teacher.
Eighth graders also receive special instruction in social studies classes on law education and reporting weapon carr ying and crimes to appropriate officials.
Parents play an important role in Otto's drug and violence prevention strategy.
Parent classes are held periodically on topics such as "Conflict Resolution at Home" and "Asset Building."
Each parent of an incoming student also receives a welcome bag of school materials accompanied by alcohol, tobacco, and other drug abuse and violence prevention information.
A Parent Resource Librar y provides parents with books, pamphlets, and videos on a myriad of topics such as discipline, communication, and conflict resolution skills.
During the first six months of the program, there was a 14% decrease in suspensions at school.
Teachers and students also repor ted feeling safer since the program began.
Almost two-thirds of teachers sur veyed in 1997 felt safer in or near their school than they did the previous year; and 83% indicated that the program made a difference in maintaining or reducing conflicts at school.
Similarly, 70% of students who had used the peer mediation program said that school climate at Otto had improved.
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCHO OL
SAFETY
39
Violence Prevention Curriculum for Adolescents The Violence Prevention Curriculum for Adolescents can be used individually or in conjunction with the Teenage Health Teaching Modules, a comprehensive health curriculum.
(See Substance Use Prevention Programs, below.)
Targeted to grades 9 and 10, students explore the nature of interpersonal violence and consider ways to prevent it.
The class discusses homicide statistics and characteristics, then considers the major risk factors for violence: alcohol and other drugs, weapons, and poverty.
Students examine the causes of anger and healthy and unhealthy ways to express it.
Next, they analyze the positive and negative results of fighting and role-play what happens before, during, and after a fight, learning that the longer they allow an altercation to develop, the harder it is to stop.
Finally, they discuss strategies for preventing fights and practice nonviolent alternatives to fighting.
The sample of students in both urban and rural settings received the curriculum one to four times per week.
After the program, they exhibited a reduction in antisocial and violent behaviors of 25%.
C on ta c t in for m a t i o n : E d u ca t i o n D e v e l o p m e n t C e n t e r, I n c .
5 5 C h a p e l St r e e t N e wt o n, MA 0 2 45 8- 10 60 Te l : ( 8 0 0 ) 2 2 5 - 4 2 7 6 w w w. e d c . o rg
is expected to the notion that drug use is socially unacceptable.
Evaluation results of ninth grade ALPHA Initiative participants in a rural school environment showed a substance use prevalence rate that was 14% lower than the nonprogram youth.
These results were maintained for a year.
C on ta c t i n for m a t i o n : P a m S tr e u t e r S u bs ta nc e A bu s e D iv is i on F r a n k l i n W i l l i a m s o n H u m a n S e r v i c e s, I n c .
13 07 Wes t M ai n P. O .
B o x 3 6 5 M ar i o n, IL 6 2 95 9 Te l : ( 6 1 8 ) 9 9 7 - 5 3 3 6 , e x t .
6 1 1 1 Fa x: (6 18 ) 9 93 - 2 96 9
All Stars Program The All Stars Program targets factors believed to influence high-risk behaviors in early adolescence.
It is designed to promote positive character development, while deterring the onset of negative behaviors.
The core program involves 14, 45-minute classroom sessions, with supplemental homebased components.
An eight session booster program is also available.
Students are taught that high-risk behaviors interfere with their desired lifestyle.
The interactive curriculum uses games, debates, projects, taped performances, and active discussion to promote student commitment to avoiding high-risk behaviors, teaching ideals incompatible with high-risk behavior, and increasing students' awareness about the prevalence and acceptability of high-risk behavior among their peers.
The evaluated sample of All Stars included seventh grade students in a small, multiethnic North Carolina town consisting of mainly blue collar and midlevel-professional households.
The seventh grade program youth had a prevalence rate that was 8% lower for use of alcohol, tobacco, marijuana, and hard drugs than nonprogram youth.
C o n t a c t i n f o rm a t i o n : W i l l ia m H a n s e n K a t h l e e n N e l s on - S i m l e y Ta n g l e w oo d R e s e a r c h , I n c .
P. O .
B o x 1 7 7 2 Cle mm on s, NC 27 01 2- 17 72 Te l : ( 8 0 0 ) 8 2 6 - 4 5 3 9 F ax: (3 36 ) 7 78 - 0 44 3 E -m ai l: b il l ha n s en@ t an g le wo o d. ne t E - m a i l : k s2 1 7 2 7 @ n a v i x . n e t w w w. t a n g l e w o o d . n e t
Substance Use Prevention Programs
Adolescents Learning Positive Health Alternative Initiative The Adolescents Learning Positive Health Alternative (ALPHA) Initiative is a peer-led substance use prevention program that enlists socially prominent, drug-free 11th and 12th grade youth to introduce communication techniques, refusal skills, assertiveness skills, and decision making skills to 7th, 8th, and 9th grade youth.
Peer leaders are selected by the student body, faculty, and school administrators and are trained in methods of classroom management and group facilitation.
A team of two or three peer leaders implements the program in junior high or middle school classrooms without teachers present.
ALPHA teams are supervised by an inschool sponsor who oversees the program.
The curriculum consists of 12 sessions administered over the course of 12 weekly sessions.
Each session has clear learning objectives, training protocol, and classroom activities and incorporates both cognitive and affective experiences.
Curriculum content strives to change the students' perception that drug use
40
1 999
AN NU AL
REPORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
Juneau-Douglas High School Juneau, Alaska High School, Grades 9-12 Town
Sc ho ol S afe t y F o c us :
Peer Empower ment Peer education and Mentoring Ser vice Lear ning Daily Exposure and Reinforcement of Prevention Activities Strong Student Ownership
Co ntac t I nf or m a t i o n :
Ron Gleason, Principal Juneau-Douglas High School 10014 Crazy Horse Drive Juneau, AK (907) 463-1900 (phone) (907) 463-1919 (fax) www.jsd.k12.ak.us/jdhs/jdhs
Southeast Alaska, where Juneau is the hub city, has the highest rate of binge drinking in the state and the highest alcoholism rate per capita in the nation.
In 1996, Alaskan educators and community members, Juneau representatives among them, were designated to develop "Healthy Life Skills Standards for all Alaskan Students."
They identified an epidemic of adolescent personal and social ir responsibility as the most pressing problem involving youth.
High rates of drug and alcohol use, teen pregnancy, and suicide were evident.
Results from the most recent Youth Risk Behavior Survey conducted in Juneau indicated that 79% of high school students have consumed alcohol on one or more days in their lifetime.
In addition, 26% have consumed alcohol one or more days in during the past 20-39 days.
A 1995 Juneau Community Profile Risk Assessment also indicated high levels of youth alcohol, tobacco, and other drug use.
In response, Juneau-Douglas High School has adopted the "Students for Social Responsibility and Mediation" (SSRM) program.
The program's main focus is on peer empowerment and personal and social skills delivered through peer education and mentoring, experiential learning, retreats, and a "teacher as respectful coach" approach to instruction.
The SSRM program works in close cooperation with other prevention players, among them the Juneau-Douglas High School Student Assistance Program, the Police Officer in the Schools Program, the Mayor's Task Force on Youth, a local Inter-Agency team, the Juneau Career Center, the Teen Health Center, the Teen Court, and 11 other community agencies.
The overall goal of the SSRM program in the Juneau School District is to create dynamic school-based communities that challenge and support each student to demonstrate responsible behavior, both personally and socially.
Students are taught empowerment through assuming real life roles--roles of responsibility, caring, and authority.
As a result of these efforts, Juneau-Douglas has documented a significant decrease in student violence as well as an overall reduction in drug use.
Not only have suspensions decreased from 1997 to 1998, but there has also been a shift in the reasons for suspension.
Previously, the main reason cited for male suspension was possession of controlled substances.
In 1998, the primary reason for suspension was failure to serve detention.
Suspensions for female students changed similarly, with the main reason for suspension being assault in 1997.
In 1998, the primar y reason for suspension was failure to serve detention.
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCHO OL
SAFETY
41
Growing Healthy Growing Healthy, a comprehensive, school health education curriculum for kindergarten through grade six, is designed to promote healthy behaviors through knowledge and skills building.
The program is built on the premise that children who understand how their bodies work, how certain behaviors impact health, and who are adequately equipped with specific decision making skills will be able to resist social pressures to engage in risk behaviors such as using alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs.
Growing Healthy provides 50 hours of classroom instruction in a series of approximately 50 sequential lessons at each grade level.
Ten health content areas are addressed yearly and include growth and development, mental and emotional health, personal health, family life and health, nutrition, disease prevention and control, safety and first aid, consumer health, substance use and abuse, and community and environmental health management.
Materials are grade specific and include curriculum guides, peripheral materials (e.g., books, videos, models, games, and software), teacher materials (e.g., charts, posters, activity cards), and student handouts.
Complete implementation is necessary, as the curriculum builds upon previously learned knowledge and skills.
The evaluated sample included suburban students in grades four through six.
The fifth and sixth grade program youth had a prevalence rate that was 15% lower for use of alcohol and tobacco than nonprogram youth.
C o n t a c t i n f or m a t i o n : N ati o na l C en t er fo r H eal t h Edu c at io n 7 2 S pr i ng S tr ee t, Sui te 20 8 N e w Yo r k , N Y 1 0 0 1 2 - 4 0 1 9 Te l : ( 2 1 2 ) 3 3 4 - 9 4 7 0 , e x t .
2 7 F ax: ( 21 2) 33 4- 98 45 E-m ai l: n c h e@ nc he .o r g w w w. n c h e . o r g
each grade level, a skill-builder unit promotes the development of self-esteem, goal setting, decision making, communication, assertiveness, and stress management.
All student activities are aligned to one or more of the National Health Education Standards and the New Standards Primary Literacy Standards for the English Language Arts.
The program also includes performance assessments, workshops, brochures, and letters for families.
KYB can easily be integrated into the following programs in typical schools: science, math, social studies, language arts, and physical education.
In the majority of schools, KYB is taught by the classroom generalist.
It is recommended that KYB curriculum be preceded by a teacher training session.
The KYB teacher training is individually tailored to meet the specific needs of the school, district, and community.
The curriculum is multiethnic and has been translated into seven languages.
To complete the core lessons of the curriculum, approximately 35 hours of classroom instruction are required per year.
The program was evaluated for a sample of African-American and White students in an urban setting.
The fifth and sixth grade program youth had a prevalence rate for tobacco that was 23 percent lower than non program youth.
C o n t a c t i n f o rm a t i o n : Am er i c an He al th F o u nd at i on 67 5 3r d A v enu e, 11 th Fl o or N e w Yo r k , N Y 1 0 0 1 7 Te l : ( 2 1 2 ) 5 5 1 - 2 5 0 9 F ax : ( 2 12 ) 6 97 - 4 37 4 E- m a il: K YB pr o g r a m @ a o l . c o m w w w. a h f . o rg
Life Skills Training The Life Skills Training (LST) program is designed to prevent tobacco, alcohol, and other drug use by providing middle school students, the motivation and skills necessary to resist peer and media pressure to use drugs.
LST is a three-year sequential curriculum.
The first year consists of 15 class periods in the sixth or seventh grade followed by a two-year booster component of ten class periods in the second year and five class periods in the third.
The core curriculum focuses on providing prevention-related information, promoting antidrug norms, teaching drug refusal skills, and facilitating the development of selfmanagement and general social skills.
LST has been tested with a wide range of adolescents and has been shown effective among White, AfricanAmerican, and Latino youths, both male and female, in
Know Your Body Know Your Body (KYB) is an innovative, comprehensive, skills-based health education program for children in grades K-6.
KYB aims to provide young people with the knowledge, attitudes, skills, and experience necessary to practice health behaviors.
KYB instills within children a belief that they are responsible for their own thoughts, feelings, and actions to maintain a healthy lifestyle.
The KYB curriculum utilizes a combination of developmentally-appropriate health instruction, as well as cognitive and behavioral skills building, to address a wide range of health and social issue-related topics.
At the beginning of
42
199 9
AN NU AL
REP ORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAFETY
urban, suburban, and rural environments.
The seventh grade program youth had a prevalence rate for use of alcohol, tobacco, and marijuana that was 6% lower than the nonprogram youth.
Additional evaluations of the Life Skills Training program found a 31% reduction in alcohol use, 32% reduction in alcohol and marijuana use after four months, and 4% reduction in alcohol and marijuana use after 16 months for those students involved with the program.
C on ta c t in for m a t i o n : P r i n c e t o n H e a l t h P re s s 1 15 Wal l S tr e e t Pr i nc e t on , NJ 08 54 0 Te l : ( 8 0 0 ) 6 3 6 - 3 4 1 5 w w w. l i f e s k i l l s t r a i n i n g . co m
Preventive Alcohol Education Program To increase skills in resisting the persuasive efforts of their peers, youth view a film on the physiological effects of alcohol and the types of arguments people use to convince others that they can drink and drive safely.
Question and answer sessions follow with in-class role-plays.
Attempting to "inoculate" the students against driving drunk, the roleplays use scripts that focus on situations involving alcohol and provide familiarity with pro-drinking-and-driving arguments that encourage peers to engage in these risky behaviors.
The role-plays are followed by immediate feedback.
Finally, a slide show summarizes the knowledge component and argument portions of the previous sessions.
Ninth graders receive this program for two to three hours per week for five weeks.
The self-reports of the program youth compared to the nonprogram youth show a prevalence rate that was 16% lower for frequency of drinking alcohol in the last 30 days.
Importantly, program youth also report an impressive 22% reduction in actual refusals to drive with friends who had been drinking.
C on ta c t in for m at io n : El i as D ur ye a, P h. D .
D e p a r t me nt o f He al th E d uc at i on Un iv e rs i ty of N e w Me xi c o 26 6 Ho k on a H a ll A l b u q u e rq u e , N M 8 7 1 3 1 Te l : ( 5 0 5 ) 2 7 7 - 3 6 7 4 E- m ai l: ed u r y e a @ u n m . e d u
schools, and communities.
The curriculum combines classroom-based interventions with parent, peer, and community wide interventions to reduce underage drinking.
Parental involvement is an essential feature of the program, with the greatest emphasis occurring in the first two years.
The parent component focuses on building parent/child relationships and promoting communication on the subject of alcohol use.
The program includes both demand and supply reduction strategies at all levels of the intervention.
The curriculum is available for grades six through eight.
"Slick Tracy" is the grade six intervention and is conducted primarily with parents and adolescents in their homes.
This portion of the curriculum presents facts on underage drinking and health and discusses parental communication with teens about drinking, parents as role models, developing family guidelines against underage drinking, peer pressures and resistance strategies, and the consequences of underage drinking.
The seventh-grade program, "Amazing Alternatives!," maintains active parent components but works primarily with students in the classroom.
This school-based intervention aims to develop skills for dealing with peers and to build positive peer group influences.
"PowerLines," the eighth grade classroom intervention, emphasizes influences beyond peers and families and empowers students to create healthy changes in their broader communities to discourage underage drinking.
The program was implemented in a rural setting.
Students received instruction four hours per month for two to three months each of the three years.
The seventh and eighth grade program youth had a prevalence rate that was 10% lower for use of alcohol, tobacco, and marijuana than the nonprogram youth.
C on ta c t i n for m a t i o n : C h e r y l P e rr y, P h .D . , P r i n c i p a l I n v e s t i g a t o r S a r a Ve b l e n - M o r t e n s o n , P r o j e c t D i r e c t o r D i vi s i o n o f E p i d e m i o l o g y S ch o o l o f P u bl ic H ea lt h U n i v e r s i t y o f M in n e s o t a 1 30 0 S .
Se co n d S t. , S u i te 3 00 Mi nn ea p ol i s, M N 5 5 45 4 -10 15 Te l : ( 6 1 2 ) 6 2 4 - 0 0 5 7 O r de r in g In f or ma tio n : H a zel d e n Pu b li s hi ng a n d E du c ati o n P. O .
B o x 1 7 6 C e n t e r C i t y, M N 5 5 0 1 2 - 0 1 7 6 Te l : ( 8 0 0 ) 3 2 8 - 9 0 0 0 w w w. h a z e l d e n . c o m
Project Northland Project Northland is a comprehensive alcohol use prevention curriculum for middle school aged youth, their parents,
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
43
Project STAR Project STAR, also known as Project I-STAR or the Midwestern Prevention Project (MPP), is a comprehensive, community-based drug abuse prevention program that bridges the transition from early adolescence to middle through later adolescence.
Since early adolescence is the first risk period for gateway drug use (i.e., alcohol, cigarettes, and marijuana), programming is initiated with whole populations of middle school (sixth or seventh grade) students.
This multicomponent, comprehensive school-based program is available on a limited basis to communities that have collectively determined a need for the program and that have formed a community collaborative linked to the school, parents, business, civic leaders, local government or law enforcement, and the media.
Generally the community will have conducted a needs assessment of both the school and the community prior to pursuing adoption of Project STAR.
Seventh and eighth grade youth who participated in Project STAR had a prevalence rate that was 9% lower for alcohol, tobacco, and marijuana use compared to youth who did not participate.
Effects on gateway drugs were maintained through high school.
Toward the end of high school and into young adulthood, effects emerged on other drugs, including cocaine, methamphetamines, and LSD.
C on ta c t in for m a t i o n : A ng e l a La p in I ns t it u te f or Pr ev en ti on Re se ar c h U n i v e r s i t y o f S o ut h e r n C a l i f o r n i a 1 4 4 1 E a s t L a k e Av e n u e , M S 4 4 Lo s Ang e les , C A 90 03 3 -08 00 Te l : ( 3 2 3 ) 8 6 5 - 0 3 2 5 F ax: ( 32 3) 86 5- 01 34 E- m ai l: la p in @ hs c. u sc. e d u
Teenage Health Teaching Modules The Teenage Health Teaching Modules (THTM), for students in grades 6-12, is a comprehensive health program that targets the secondary grades.
The curriculum contains materials on alcohol, tobacco and other drugs, and emphasizes resistance, personal, and social skills taught through cooperative and small group learning.
Many homework assignments involve families, and optional community service projects are presented.
The curriculum is published by the Education Development Center.
The program consists of a series of modules, each of which includes a teacher's guide with a detailed framework for conducting classroom activities.
Each module contains 6-15 class sessions, 45 minutes long.
Certain essential health skills are highlighted in each module including risk assessment, self-assessment, communication, decision making, goal setting, health advocacy, and healthy self-management.
The underlying philosophy of THTM is that everything we do or do not do is a statement of who we are; we express ourselves, our values, and our beliefs through behavior.
The program provides opportunities for students to recognize that many factors affect health and well-being.
Students from a mix of ethnic and racial groups received instruction seven hours per month for four months.
The 7th through 12th grade program youth had a prevalence rate that was 7% lower for the use of alcohol, tobacco, and hard drugs than nonprogram youth.
(See also "Violence Prevention Curriculum for Adolescents" under Violence Prevention Programs, above.)
C o n t a c t i n f or m a t i o n : E d u c a t i o n D e v e l o p m e n t C e n t e r, I n c .
5 5 C hap el St r e e t N ewt o n, MA 0 2 4 58 -1 84 0 Te l : ( 8 0 0 ) 2 2 5 - 4 2 7 6 w w w. e d c . o rg
Westchester Student Assistance Program The Westchester Student Assistance Program (SAP) is based on the successful employee assistance programs used by industry to identify employees whose work and lives are adversely affected by substance abuse.
SAP provides confidential counseling in small groups of 6-10 youths or individual counseling during the school day.
The counseling groups are organized by problem area.
Examples of some of the groups include students new to the school district, students who acknowledge having problems with parents or peers, seniors who are unsure about post-graduation
44
199 9
AN NU AL
REP ORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAFETY
Gonzalo Garza Independence High School Austin, Texas High School, Grades 9-12 Urban
S cho ol S af e t y F o cus :
Small, Caring School Envir onment Individualized Instruction
Co nt ac t I nfo r m a t i o n :
Vicki Baldwin, Principal Gonzalo Gar za Independence High School 1600 Chicon Str eet Austin, TX (512) 414-8600 (phone) (512) 414-8610 (fax) www.austin.isd.tenet.edu/campuses/schools/hs/gar za
Gonzalo Garza Independence High School is a school of choice that is available to high school aged students throughout Austin who wish to earn their high school diploma.
It was designed to remove the traditional barriers of a typical high school, utilizing best practices and the most current research.
Garza exemplifies excellence and equity for all its students through an individualized, challenging, and accelerated education that reengages young people in learning and restores confidence in their talents and abilities.
Above all, Garza strives for a sense of community, collaboration, caring, and empowerment in a drug-free, safe environment.
A small school of 300 students, Garza is designed to be an alternative to the traditional high school for students who may not have had successful educational experiences in the past.
Students apply to Garza and are admitted based on their desire to succeed.
Four teen percent of students at Garza are recovered dropouts who were not in school immediately prior to enrolling at Garza.
The remaining students were previously enrolled in one of the ten other Austin high schools.
Garza's emphasis on individualizing instruction in an atmosphere of trust and respect has met with success.
In its first 23 weeks of operation, 49 students met graduation requirements.
During the 1998-99 school year, 119 students met graduation requirements, more than doubling the number of students from the previous semester.
Students benefit from an innovative interdisciplinary curriculum that integrates academic content with career development and project-based learning, allowing students to develop high-level skills in a real-world context.
Standards and expectations are high for all students as they master the curriculum and meet all local and state graduation requirements.
Indeed, many students graduate with honors in an advanced plan while others are currently dual-enrolled in college courses at Austin Community College.
Further, students learn the value of community and civic responsibility by completing community service projects in which they give at least 20 hours of service.
Garza's diverse ethnic and socio-economic population, however, is not immune to the effects of violence and drugs.
In February 1999, a student was lost to a drug overdose after a long battle in and out of rehabilitation.
And, just days before the school shootings in Colorado, two students died in particularly sad circumstances, one from suicide, the other murdered.
However, while Garza students encounter violence in a ver y real and frightening way outside of school, they have yet to experience it in school.
Since its opening in January 1998, Garza has not seen a single act of violence, any weapons, or incidents of graffiti.
19 99
ANNUAL
REPORT
ON
SCHO OL
SAFE TY
45
plans, students with alcoholic parents, and students who are abusing alcohol or drugs.
Groups are rotated through the school schedule so that no student misses the same class more than once every eight weeks.
Most of the youth voluntarily choose to work with the SAP counselors.
Some are required to participate in the counseling because they have violated school policy The counselors hold graduate degrees and have at least two years of experience.
This program is one of the most promising approaches for high school youth (grades 9-12).
SAP youth showed a 38% lower prevalence rate for use of alcohol, marijuana, and hard drugs compared to other Westchester County youth.
C on ta c t i n for m at io n : El l en M o r e h o u s e S tu de n t As s i st an ce S e r v i c e s 66 0 W hi t e Pl ai n s Ro a d Ta r r y t o w n , N Y 1 0 5 9 1 Te l : ( 9 1 4 ) 3 3 2 - 1 3 0 0 F ax: (9 1 4) 3 6 6- 8 82 6 E-m ai l: s as c o rp @a o l. c om
The intervention begins when students are in the seventh grade and lasts for three years, including booster sessions.
Evaluations show a 35% reduction in arrests (having a county court file) and a 40% reduction in drug use for students who participated in the program compared with students who did not participate.
C o n t a c t i n f or m a t i o n : B r e n n a B r y, P h .
D .
G r a d u a t e S c h o ol o f A p p l ie d a n d P r o f e s s io n a l P s y c h o l o g y R ut g er s Un ive r si ty 1 52 F r el in g hu ys e n R o ad P i s c a t a w a y, N J 0 8 8 5 4 - 8 0 8 5 Te l : ( 7 3 2 ) 4 4 5 - 2 1 8 F a x: ( 7 32 ) 4 45 - 4 88 8 E - m a i l : b b r y @ rc i . ru t g e r s . e d u
Fast Track Fast Track is a long-term program that targets chronic and severe conduct problems of children through interventions with the school, home, and individual student.
The program contains both universal and selective levels of intervention.
The universal intervention is a primary prevention strategy directed at all first- through fifth-grade children to strengthen the skills needed for successful adaptation to school and to prevent the emergence of school adjustment difficulties.
The goal of the universal intervention is to reduce the disruptiveness of the classroom and improve its manageability by the teacher.
These changes reduce the level of stimulation for inappropriate behavior on the part of the high risk children who receive the selective intervention.
Classroom teachers are trained by Fast Track staff in the use of the Promoting Alternative Thinking Strategies (PATHS) curriculum.
The high-risk children are identified in kindergarten by their disruptive behavior at school and at home.
They receive a program of services that extends from first grade through the end of middle school.
It is most intensive in first grade, consisting of parent and child skill building groups, home visits with families, a peer relations component at school, reading tutoring, and school-based case management.
The frequency of groups is reduced in successive grades but involves a more intense intervention again at the transition into middle school, where parenting and youth support services continue along with mentoring and support for identity and vocational development.
Problem Behavior Prevention Programs
Behavioral Monitoring and Reinforcement Program The program targets adolescents who demonstrate characteristics that have been associated with delinquency and substance abuse, including: low motivation for school, disregard for rules, and feelings of alienation from their parents.
Risk factors include academic failure, early behavior problems, alienation from family, and low level of commitment to school.
The intervention involves four components: weekly report cards, discussion of report cards, parental contact, and booster sessions in later years.
Program staff compile a weekly report card on the basis of teacher interviews regarding behavior in the classroom (i.e., bringing materials to class, tardiness, and completion of work.)
Students meet with program staff in small group sessions to discuss the report cards.
Positive reports elicit praise and approval from staff, while negative reports elicit discussions of how the student can improve their behavior.
Parents are kept informed of their children's progress through phone calls, letters, and home visits.
After two years of the intervention, students attend booster sessions given every two weeks that follow the same format.
46
199 9
AN NU AL
REP ORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAFETY
Margaret Leary Elementary School Butte, Montana Elementary School, Grades K-6 Town
Sc ho ol Sa fe t y F o c us:
School Safety Team Conflict Resolution Effective Classroom Management Crisis Response Plan Strong Community Involvement
Co n tac t I nf or m a t i o n :
Paula Lynch, Principal Margaret Lear y Elementar y School 1301 4 Mile Vue Road Butte, MT 59701 (406) 496-2100 (phone) (406) 494-1216 (fax) galler y.in-tch.com/~buttesd1/district/schools/mgtlear y/default
On April 24, 1994, Margaret Lear y Elementary School was the site of a school shooting.
The shooter, a ten-yearold student, killed another student as the children lined up to enter the school for the day.
The tragedy ser ved as a wake-up call, not only to Butte, but to all Montana schools, and propelled the school community into action.
A site-based School Safety Team played a critical role in helping the school heal and return to teaching and learning activities.
The Safety Team instituted a comprehensive plan designed to support the school community that includes conflict resolution and after-school programs, mentorships, student assistance teams, school security checks, and crime victim assistance programs.
The school also developed a school-wide disaster prevention, intervention, and response plan.
Inter vention strategies utilized in the plan include: active collaboration among community/government agencies, after-school daycare, structured recreation, safe school team building, positive self-esteem building, training on early warning signs of violence, and development of classroom management and crisis planning procedures.
All School Safety Team members and classroom teachers are trained in student behavior modification and help develop action plans for students identified as at-risk by parents, teachers, or other students.
This team takes responsibility for ever y aspect of the student's needs by developing workable solutions for both academic and emotional issues.
Safety Team members also participate in conflict resolution training and in a Playground Facilitator program.
The school counselor is trained in the Second Step curriculum and has trained other district counselors in teaching violence prevention and response to post-traumatic stress.
The Safety Team also helps establish community partnerships and mentoring programs.
The Safety Team is currently creating a Parent Resource Center for parenting classes and adult educational programs.
Since the establishment of the School Safety Team, Margaret Leary Elementar y School has begun to heal its wounds.
The multiple, integrated prevention activities have resulted in a school environment that is cohesive, and includes community participation.
1999
ANNUA L
REP ORT ON
SCH OOL
SAFE TY
47
The program was evaluated for over 900 high-risk youth from four different U.S. communities, who received the program during their first, second, and third grade years.
Evaluators found that 11% fewer students in the program were diagnosed with an Individual Education Plan (students showing a need for special education attention), than students not participating in the program.
C o n t a c t i n f o rm a t i o n : Jo hn Co i e Ps yc h ol o gy De p ar t m e n t D u ke U n iv er s i ty B o x 9 00 85 D u r ham , N C 27 70 8 -00 85 Te l : ( 9 1 9 ) 2 8 6 - 2 0 0 8 , e x t .
2 2 2 F ax: (9 19 ) 2 8 6- 3 22 1 E-m ai l: j o hn. c o i e@ duk e. ed u w w w. f a s t t r a c k . v a n d e r b i l t . e d u
Evaluators found a 4% reduction in drug use, a 3% reduction in total delinquency, and a 4.5% reduction in minor offenses for those students that received G.R.E.A.T. training, compared to those students who did not receive training.
C o n t a c t i n f or m a t i o n : AT F G .
R .
E .
A .
T. P r o g r a m B r a n c h P. O .
B o x 5 0 4 1 8 Wa s h i n g t o n , D C 2 0 0 9 1 - 0 4 1 8 Te l : ( 8 0 0 ) 7 2 6 - 7 0 7 0 E - m a i l : g r e a t @ a t f h q . a t f . t re a s . g o v w w w. a t f . t re a s . g o v / g re a t / g r e a t . h t m
Gang Resistance Education and Training Program The Gang Resistance Education and Training (G.R.E.A.T.)
Program is a gang and violence prevention program for grades three through eight with a nine-lesson core curriculum.
It is designed to help children set goals for themselves, resist pressures, learn how to resolve conflict without violence, and understand how gangs and youth violence impact the quality of their lives.
G.R.E.A.T. students discover for themselves the ramifications of gang and youth violence through structured exercises and interactive approaches to learning.
The program brings together the combined efforts of law enforcement, schools, and the community to make a difference in the lives of children by providing them with the necessary skills and information to say "no" to gangs and acts of random violence.
The G.R.E.A.T. curriculum is taught by trained, certified, uniformed police officers/special agents to elementary, junior high, and middle school children.
The classroom sessions include material on laws, crime, victims, gangs, and drug use.
Both the police officer/special agent and the teacher work together to reduce gang involvement in the school and the community.
48
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
Resources CHAPTER 4
T h e o r ga ni za t io n s a nd r e s o u r c es l i s t e d a r e n o t e x h a u s t i v e , n o r i s t h e i r i nc l u s i on i n t e nd ed a s a n e nd or s em e n t b y t he U .
S .
D ep a r tm e nt o f E d u c at i o n or t h e U .
S .
D e p a r t m en t o f Ju s t i c e. R a t h e r, t h e s e l i st i ng s a r e in te nd e d to a s s i s t s c h o o l s an d c o m m u n i t i e s i n d e v e l o p i n g a nd e n h a n c i n g c o m pr e he ns i v e s c h oo l s af et y p l an s .
1999
ANNUAL
REPORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
49
FEDERAL RESOURCES U.S. Depar tment of Education
400 Maryland Avenue, SW Washington, DC 20202 www.ed.gov Sa fe an d Drug-Fr e e S ch oo ls P rogram
ended; and demonstrate and evaluate the ability of agencies practicing community policing to significantly improve the quality of life by reducing the levels of violence, crime, and disorder in their communities.
Offi ce o f Juv eni le J us tic e a nd Del in q ue ncy Prev en ti on (O JJ D P)
www.ed.gov/offices/OESE/SDFS The Safe and Drug-Free Schools Program is the Federal government's primary vehicle for reducing drug, alcohol, and tobacco use, and violence, through education and prevention activities in our Nation's schools.
Offi ce o f Sp e ci al E du ca tio n Pro gr am s (O SE P)
www.ojjdp.ncjrs.org OJJDP's mission is to provide national leadership, coordination, and resources to develop, implement, and support effective methods of preventing juvenile victimization and responding appropriately to juvenile delinquency.
This is accomplished through prevention programs and a juvenile justice system that protects the public safety, holds juvenile offenders accountable, and provides treatment and rehabilitative services based on the needs of each juvenile.
N ati o nal C r imi na l J ust i ce R e fe re nc e S er vice (NC JR S )
www.ed.gov/offices/OSERS/OSEP OSEP provides leadership and fiscal resources to assist State and local efforts to educate children with disabilities in order to improve results for those children and to ensure equal protection of the law.
Offi ce o f Cor re cti o nal Ed uc at io n ( OC E)
www.ncjrs.org NCJRS is one of the most extensive sources of information on criminal and juvenile justice in the world, providing services to an international community of policymakers and professionals.
NCJRS is a collection of clearinghouses supporting all bureaus of the U.S. Department of Justice, Office of Justice Programs (OJP): the National Institute of Justice, OJJDP, the Bureau of Justice Statistics, the Bureau of Justice Assistance, the Office for Victims of Crime, and the OJP Program Offices.
Na ti ona l I n s tit ute o f Ju sti ce
www.ed.gov/offices/OVAE/OCE In April 1991, the U.S. Department of Education created a new office to provide national leadership on issues in correctional education.
OCE provides technical assistance to States, local schools, and correctional institutions and shares information on correctional education.
R egi ona l Edu cat io n La bor at ori e s
www.nwrel.org/national This website provides a map of links to all 10 Regional Education Laboratories supported by the U.S. Department of Education to provide technical assistance to educators.
U. S. De p ar tme nt o f Ju st ic e
www.ojp.usdoj.gov/nij The National Institute of Justice is the research and development arm of the U.S. Department of Justice.
Created by Congress in 1968, the Institute is charged with investing public funds to develop knowledge that will reduce crime, enhance public safety, and improve the administration of justice.
U .
S. De par t me nt o f He alth a n d H um an S er vices
950 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW Washington, DC 20530-0001 www.usdoj.gov Of fic e o f Comm u nit y O ri e nte d Pol ic i ng S e r vic es (CO PS)
www.usdoj.gov/cops Established under the Public Safety Partnership and Community Policing Act of 1994, COPS has four primary goals: increase the number of community policing officers on the beat by 100,000; promote the implementation of department-wide community policing in law enforcement agencies across the country; help develop an infrastructure that will institutionalize and sustain community policing after Federal funding has
200 Independence Avenue, SW Washington, DC 20201 www.hhs.gov Su bs ta nce Ab us e a nd M ent al Se rv ice s A dm in ist ra ti on (S AM H SA )
www.samhsa.gov SAMHSA's mission within the Nation's health system is to improve the quality and availability of prevention, treatment, and rehabilitation services to reduce illness, death, disability, and cost to society from substance abuse and mental illnesses.
50
19 99
ANNUAL
REPORT
ON
SCHO OL S AFE TY
Merrill Road Elementary School Jacksonville, Florida Elementar y School, Grades K-5 City Sc ho ol Sa fe t y F o c us :
Daily Prevention Pledge Peer Mediation/Conflict Resolution After-School Program Tutoring Community Partnerships
Co nt ac t I nfo r m a t i o n :
Cynthia Anderson, Principal Merrill Road Elementar y School 8239 Merrill Road Jacksonville, FL 32277 (904) 745-4919 (phone) (904) 745-4983 (fax)
Despite high rates of drug use by high school students in surrounding areas, Merrill Road Elementar y School has successfully created a school environment with zero tolerance for drug use and violence.
Merrill Road Elementar y School has implemented a "NO USE/NON-VIOLENT" philosophy through the school's Zeroing in on Prevention (ZIP) program.
The ZIP team, comprised of faculty, staff, parents and community members, is responsible for developing the program's objectives and annual plan and super vises implementation.
Objectives are established for each of the five essential program components: prevention, intervention, support groups, parent/community invol-vement, and evaluation.
Because Merrill's goal is to maintain "zero" incidents, and because its absence rates were increasing, the ZIP Team has added truancy as a program goal.
Merrill's comprehensive intervention and prevention program includes activities designed to increase student resiliency and positive behavior.
All students are taught non-violence and conflict resolution skills, using the Peace Foundation curri-culum, which incorporates values of tolerance and respect for differences.
Health education classes, incorporating alcohol, tobacco, and other drug use prevention skills, are taught and reinforced at every grade level.
Other prevention efforts include: mentoring, peer mediation, after-school programs, tutoring, and parenting education.
Community resources are also made available and are utilized by staff and administration.
The Terr y Parker Full Service Center links the schools to youth development, family and child guidance ser vices, health and social services, juvenile justice, family literacy, case management, and family welfare services.
Since Merrill Elementar y's intensive focus on truancy prevention began, the number of students absent 21 or more days decreased from 14 students during the 199798 school year, to one student during the 1998-99 school year.
The total number of crime incidents has also decreased from three in 1996-97, to zero in 1998-99.
1 999
AN NUAL
REPORT
ON
SCHOOL
SAFETY
51
Ce nt er f or Me nt al Hea lth Se r vice s ( CM HS )
www.samhsa.gov/cmhs CMHS, a SAMHSA program, provides national leadership to prevent and treat mental disorders; improve access and promote high-quality services for people with, or at risk for, these disorders; and promote improvement of mental health for all Americans and rehabilitation services for individuals with mental illness.
C ent er f or S ubs ta n ce Ab us e P r ev e nt io n (C SA P)
and children, including families with low income levels, those with diverse racial and ethnic heritages, and those living in rural or isolated areas without access to care.
H ea l th Re so urc e s an d Se r vi ce s A dm i nis tra t ion , Bur e au of Pr i ma r y H e alt h C ar e (B PH C)
www.bphc.hrsa.dhhs.gov BPHC promotes and establishes school-based health centers as an effective way to improve the health of vulnerable children and adolescents.
ONLINE FEDERAL DOCUMENTS A nnu a l R epo r t on Sc h ool Sa fe ty, 1 998
www.samhsa.gov/csap/index.htm CSAP, a SAMHSA program, provides national leadership in the Federal effort to prevent alcohol, tobacco, and illicit drug problems.
N a ti ona l I n st it ute o f Men ta l He a l th (N IM H)
www.ed.gov/pubs/AnnSchoolRept98 Details the nature and scope of school violence and provides information on model programs, resources, and steps that schools and communities can take to create and maintain safe learning environments.
Ch il d De ve lo p men t/ Comm u nit y Po l ici ng : Pa r t ner s hi p i n a Cl im at e of V iolence
www.nimh.nih.gov NIMH conducts and supports research nationwide on mental illness and mental health, including studies of the brain, behavior, and mental health services.
NIMH is the foremost mental health research organization in the world, with a mission dedicated to improving the mental health of the American people; fostering better understanding of effective diagnosis, treatment, and rehabilitation of mental and brain disorders; and supporting research on interventions to prevent mental illness or to reduce the frequency of recurrent episodes of mental illnesses and their disabling consequences.
C en t er s f or Di sea s e C on trol a n d P r ev en t io n, D i vis i on of A dol es ce nt a nd Sc hoo l He al th ( DA SH)
www.ncjrs.org/jjdp.htm Describes a unique collaborative program between the New Haven, Connecticut, Department of Police Services and the Child Study Center at the Yale University School of Medicine that addresses the psychological impact of chronic exposure to community violence on children and families.
This program serves as a national model for police-mental health partnerships across the country.
Co m bat in g F ear a nd R e st orin g Sa fe ty in Sc h ool
www.cdc.gov/nccdphp/dash DASH's mission is to: identify the highest priority health risks among youth, monitor the incidence and prevalence of those risks, implement national programs to prevent risks, and evaluate and improve those programs.
Ce nt ers for D i se a se C ontr ol an d P reve n tio n , Di v isi on of V io le nce Prevention
www.ncjrs.org/jjvict.htm Focuses on the national effort to reach youth who are absent or truant from school because of school-associated fear and intimidation.
Conflic t R e so lu ti on Ed uc ati o n: A G ui d e t o I mp lem ent i ng Pr ogr am s i n Sc hoo ls , Youth-Serv i ng O rg an iz ati o ns, an d Co m muni t y and Juv eni le Jus ti ce S ett i ngs
www.cdc.gov/ncipc/dvp/dvp.htm The Division of Violence Prevention in CDC's National Center for Injury Prevention and Control has four priority areas for violence prevention: youth violence, family and intimate violence, suicide, and firearm injuries.
H eal th R eso ur ce s a nd S e rvi c e s Ad mi nis tr at ion ( H RS A) , Materna l and Ch il d H e al th B ur ea u (M CB H)
www.ncjrs.org/jjdp.htm Provides a reference tool that offers both basic information and experts' experience to assist educators and other youth-serving professionals in building effective conflict resolution education programs.
The guide is based on a shared vision that youth of all ages can learn to deal constructively with conflict and live in civil association with one another.
www.hhs.gov/hrsa/mchb MCBH is charged with the primary responsibility for promoting and improving the health of the Nation's mothers
52
1999
AN NUAL
REPORT
ON
SCHO OL S AFETY
Port Chester Middle School Por t Chester, New York Middle School, Grades 5-8 Town S ch o ol Sa fe t y F o cu s:
Conflict Resolution and Peer Mediation Pr ogram Targeted Programs for At-Risk Youth After-School Programs Mentoring Pr ogram Strong Staf f, Community, and Parental Involvement Co nt ac t I nfo r m a t i o n :
Car men Macchia, Principal Port Chester Middle School Bowman Avenue Por t Chester, NY 10573 (914) 934-7930 (phone) (914) 934-7886 (fax) home.computer.net/~pcschool/MIDDLE
In 1992, Port Chester Middle School began collecting and organizing data on all referrals, failures, suspensions, weapon possessions, drug use attitudes, and community demographics.
Using data-driven policy-making, they restructured school policies and programs to reflect their commitment to meeting the needs of each student, improving student resiliency skills, addressing student antisocial behavior, and responding to the needs of at-risk students.
In order to increase student resiliency, the school adopted a comprehensive strategy that included: providing a safe and secure environment; focusing on each student's uniqueness through academic success and school culture; nurturing a sense of competency in students' ability to make positive decisions; and providing adult role models.
Port Chester's comprehensive prevention and intervention strategies consist of a "school within a school" support system, peer mediation and student assistance programs, before- and after-school violence prevention activities, and three different mentoring programs.
Once students are identified as at-risk or potentially at-risk, particular attention is placed on their needs through the Students Toward Education Progress (STEP) Program, as well as through community mentoring, social services, and counseling for students and their families.
To help address each student's individual needs, students are placed in small "school within a school" settings with enormous flexibility and no more than 25 students.
Such efforts have resulted in an improvement in academic performance and school culture, as well as a decrease in suspensions and discipline problems.
From 1995 to 1998, the number of suspensions dropped from 416 to 128, and discipline referrals dropped from over 1,000 to less than 300.
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAFETY
53
Cr ea ti ng Sa fe a nd D rug-Fr ee S choo ls : A n Ac ti on G uide
www.ed.gov/offices/OESE/SDFS/actguid/index.html Outlines action steps for schools, parents, students, and community and business groups, and provides information briefs on specific issues affecting school safety.
It also contains research and evaluation findings and a list of resources and additional readings.
E ar ly War ni ng , T im el y R e sp ons e: A G uid e to S af e Sc h ool s
quency because they are truants or dropouts, afraid to attend school, suspended or expelled, or in need of help to be reintegrated into their mainstream school from the juvenile justice system.
This Bulletin introduces a series of OJJDP Bulletins focusing on effective programs and innovative strategies to reach these children.
Sa fe , D rug-Fr ee , a nd E ff ec tiv e Sc hoo ls f or A ll S tud e nts : Wh at Works
www.ed.gov/offices/OSERS/OSEP/earlywrn.html Offers research-based practices designed to assist school communities to identify warning signs early and develop prevention, intervention, and crisis response plans.
K ee p ing You ng P eo ple in Sc ho ol: C om mu ni ty Programs Th a t Wo r k
www.air-dc.org/cecp/resources/safe
The goal of the project was to learn about schools that managed to reduce discipline problems and improve the learning and behavior of all students, including those with disabilities.
This report reflects three site visits conducted by a research team accompanied by expert panels.
Sa fe an d Sm ar t: M ak i ng th e A fte r-S ch oo l Ho urs Wo r k for K i ds
www.ncjrs.org/jjdp.htm Highlights dropout prevention initiatives, with a particular focus on the Communities in Schools initiative and its evaluation conducted by the Urban Institute.
M anu al t o Com ba t Truancy
www.ed.gov/pubs/SafeandSmart Presents positive research and examples illustrating the potential of quality after-school activities to keep children safe, out of trouble, and learning.
Specifically, it presents evidence of success--both empirical and anecdotal--for after-school activities; identifies key components of highquality programs and effective program practices; and showcases exemplary after-school and extended learning models from across the country with promising results in our Nation's efforts to keep children in school and on track.
S har i ng I nfor ma t ion : A Gu ide to the F am il y E duc at i onal R i gh ts an d P r ivac y A ct a nd Par ti ci pa ti on in Ju ve nil e Ju st ic e P rograms
www.ed.gov/pubs/Truancy Offers parents, school officials, law enforcement agencies, and communities a set of principles to design their own strategies to combat truancy and describes successful models of how anti-truancy initiatives are working in communities across the nation.
Me nto ring : A Prov en D eli nq ue nc y Pre ve nt io n S t r at eg y
www.ncjrs.org/jjdp.htm Presents the results of an independent evaluation of the Nation's oldest and largest mentoring program, Big Brothers/Big Sisters of America.
The study found that mentored youth were less likely to start using drugs or alcohol, were less assaultive, skipped fewer days of school, and had better relationships with their parents and peers than similar youth without mentors.
Pre ve nti ng Cri me: Wha t Wor ks , W h at D oe sn 't, What's Promising
www.ncjrs.org/jjgen.htm Provides basic information on the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act for elementary and secondary education professionals and those involved in the delivery of services to juveniles, including students involved in the juvenile justice system.
Tru anc y: Fi r st S te p t o a L if et i me o f P roblems
www.ncjrs.org Contains a review of more than 500 program impact evaluations and identifies what works, what does not, and what is promising in crime prevention.
Re ach ing Out to Yout h O ut of the Ed uc ati on M ain st r eam
www.ncjrs.org/jjdp.htm Discusses truancy as a major problem in this country, both for youth and society.
Highlights seven communities whose truancy reduction programs are achieving good results through innovative approaches that involve schools, law enforcement, families, businesses, judicial and social service agencies, and community and youth service organizations.
www.ncjrs.org/jjdp.htm Describes a new effort to reduce the number of juveniles who leave school prematurely and who are at risk of delin-
54
19 99
AN NUA L
REP ORT ON
SCHOOL SAFETY
Shepherd Hill Regional High School Dudley, Massachusetts Junior/Senior High School, Grades 7-12 1,499 students Town Sc ho ol Sa fe t y F o c us :
Drug Prevention and Health Education Lessons Infused in Cur riculum School/Community Prevention Partnerships Student Assistance Program Suppor tive School Climate Student-r un Initiatives Co nt ac t I nfo r m a t i o n :
Sean Gilr ein, Principal Shepherd Hill Regional High School 68 Dudley-Oxford Road Dudley, MA 01571 (508) 943-6700 (phone)
(508) 943-5956 (fax) www.ultranet.com/~shephill/index
Results from a 1989 drug use survey of high school students at Shepherd Hill Regional High School revealed that 77% of students were involved with alcohol, 33% with marijuana, 43% with tobacco, and 19% with other drugs.
Similarly, junior high school students sur veyed revealed that 55% used alcohol, 11% used marijuana, 35% used tobacco products, and 17% used other drugs.
A follow-up study in 1992-93 indicated a substantial decrease in student-repor ted substance abuse.
However, while students were choosing to have little or no involvement with illegal substances, there were enough students still using drugs and alcohol to warrant concern.
In response to the sur vey results, Shepherd Hill established a set of objectives to be met by the year 2000.
The school's objectives included: creating an orderly and safe environment for students, reducing substance abuse, and improving parental knowledge of student drug use.
The school developed a comprehensive schoolwide program to help address the needs of all students and help develop strong resiliency skills.
The program includes a grade 1-12 health instruction component that works in cooperation with other academic disciplines, school health and counseling ser vices, and community based services.
Each of these facets works individually and cooperatively to provide students with a safe and orderly learning environment.
School counselors and psychologists also are available to provide student counseling, individual assessments, and referrals to appropriate ser vices both within and outside of the school.
Family ser vices and programs are also in place to promote social and emotional growth.
A parent support group, led by the school psychologist, meets regularly to discuss adolescent issues.
In addition to extensive student and family suppor t services, Shepherd Hill Regional High School provides students with academic assistance through tutoring, academic/behavioral tracking, and academic and wellness counseling.
Core curriculum instructors meet after school on a regular basis to assist students in developing organization skills and completing homework.
Since the implementation of these academic programs, the school has experienced a 65% improvement in core subject grades.
Since implementing the program in 1989 and administering annual student drug use surveys in 1992, Shepherd Hill has seen decreases in the number of students using tobacco, alcohol, and marijuana.
The percent of seventh and eighth grade students reporting ever having used cigarrettes decreased from 51% in 1992-93 to 44% in 1996-97.
In addition, the percent of students in grades nine and ten reported a decrease in alcohol use, from 19% in 1992-93 to less than 6% in 1997-98.
1999
ANNUAL
REPORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAFE TY
55
O R G A N I Z AT I O N S A me ric an F ede ra ti on o f Teachers
Ce nt er for t h e S tu dy an d Pre ve nt io n o f Vi ol en ce
555 New Jersey Avenue, NW Washington, DC 20001 (202) 879-4400 www.aft.org B lac k Ps ych i atr i st s of A me ri c a
University of Colorado, Campus Box 442 Boulder, CO 80306 (303) 492-1032 www.colorado.edu/UCB/Research/cspv Children's De fen s e F und
866 Carlton Avenue Oakland, CA 94610 (415) 834-7103 Bo ys a nd Gi rls Cl ub s o f A me ri c a
25 E Street, NW Washington, DC 20001 (202) 628-8787 Co m muni ty Me nta l H eal t h Co unc i l
1230 West Peachtree Street, NW Atlanta, GA 30309 (404) 815-5765 www.bgca.org Ce nt er f or Ef fe cti v e C oll a bo ra ti on and Pra ct i ce
Attn: Dr. Carl Bell 8704 South Constance Street Chicago, IL 60617 (773) 734-4033 x204 Co mm uni ty P ol ici ng Cons o rtium
Improving Services for Children and Youth with Emotional and Behavioral Problems 1000 Thomas Jefferson St., NW Suite 400 Washington, DC 20007 (202) 944-5389 www.air-dc.org/cecp/cecp.html Ce nt er fo r Po s iti ve B e ha vi or In t er ve nti on a nd S up por t
1726 M Street, NW Washington, DC 20036 Publications: (800) 421-6770 www.communitypolicing.org Fed er ati o n o f Fa mil ie s f or Chi ld ren's M en tal H eal th
1021 Prince Street Alexandria, VA 22314-2971 (703) 684-7710 H is pa no/ La t ino C omm un ity P re ve nt ion N et w ork
5262 University of Oregon Eugene, OR 97403-5262 (541) 346-5311 www.stpreof.uoregon.edu
601 East Montecito Street P.O. Box 42506 Santa Barbara, CA 93140 (508) 580-7856 Na ti ona l A s soc i at io n of Bl a ck Soc ial Wor k ers
8436 West McNichols Detroit, MI 48221 Na ti ona l As so ci at io n of Ele me nta r y Sc h ool P rin c ipa ls
1615 Duke Street Alexandria, VA 22314-3483 (703) 684-3345 www.naesp.org N ati o nal As s oci at io n of S ta te M en t al He alt h Pr ogram Directors/Commissioners
66 Canal Center Plaza Suite 302 Alexandria, VA 22314 (703) 739-9333
56
19 99
ANNUA L
REP ORT ON
SCHO OL S AFE TY
N ati o nal A ss oci at io n of S ch ool P sy chol o gis ts
N at i ona l P TA
4340 East West Highway Suite 402 Bethesda, MD 20814 (301) 657-0270 www.naspweb.org/center.html Na ti ona l A s soc i at io n of Seco nda ry S ch oo l Pri nc i pa l s
330 North Wabash Avenue Suite 2100 Chicago, IL 60611-3690 (800) 307-4PTA www.pta.org Na ti ona l Te c hn ica l As sis ta n ce Ce nt er for Ch il dr en's M ent al Health
1904 Association Drive Reston, VA 22091 (703) 860-0200 www.nassp.org N at i onal B l ac k Ch il d D ev e lo pme nt I nst i tut e
Georgetown University Child Development Center 3307 M Street, NW Washington, DC 20007 (202) 687-5000 Or ga n iza ti on o f L a tin o S ocia l Wo r kers
1023 15th Street, NW, Suite 251 Washington, DC 20005 (301) 434-5688 Na ti ona l C oali tio n o f Hi sp anic H ea l th an d Hu ma n Ser vi ce s Or g an izat ion s
2319 South Damen Avenue Chicago, Il 60608 (773) 579-0832 Zero to T hr e e, Na tio na l Cen t er fo r I nfa nts , Tod dle rs , an d Families
1501 16th Street, NW Washington, DC 20036-1401 (202) 797-4321 N ati o nal Ed uc ati o n A s soc i at ion
1201 16th Street, NW Washington, DC 20036 (202) 833-4000 www.nea.org Na ti ona l H is pa ni c /L a tin o Co mm un i ty Pre ve nt io n Net wor k
734 15th Street, NW 10th Floor Washington, DC 20005-1013 (202) 638-0840
Route 1, Box 204 Espanola, NM 87532 (505) 747-188 Na ti ona l In fo rma ti on Ce nt er f o r C hil d re n and You t h wit h D i sa bi li tie s
Academy for Educational Development P.O. Box 1492 Washington, DC 20013-1492 (202) 884-8200 www.nichcy.org N at i onal M ent al Hea lt h Ass oci a ti on
1021 Prince Street Alexandria, VA 22314-2971 (703) 684-7722
1999
ANNUAL
REPORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAFE TY
57
WEBSITES Na ti ona l R e sou ce Cen te r for S af e S cho ols
Blue p ri nts for V io lenc e P revention
www.Colorado.EDU/cspv/blueprints The Center for the Study and Prevention of Violence, with funding from the Colorado Division of Criminal Justice and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (and later from the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency), initiated a project to identify ten violence prevention programs that met a very high scientific standard of program effectiveness, programs that could provide an initial nucleus for a national violence prevention initiative.
Blueprints were designed to be very practical descriptions of effective programs to allow States, communities, and individual agencies to: (1) determine the appropriateness of this intervention for their State or community; (2) provide a realistic cost estimate for this intervention; (3) provide an assessment of the organizational capacity needed to ensure its successful start-up and operation over time; and (4) give some indication of the potential barriers and obstacles that might be encountered when attempting to implement this type of intervention.
I nst it ut e o n Vi ol en ce and De st ruc ti ve Be ha vi or
www.safetyzone.org The National Resource Center for Safe Schools works with schools, communities, state and local education agencies, and other concerned individuals and agencies to create safe learning environments and prevent school violence.
Creating a safe school requires the larger school community to embrace a variety of safety strategies, as no one measure, in itself, will offer a complete solution.
Rather, schools, families, communities, students, businesses, law enforcement agencies, and the media must work together to build and model an environment conducive to learning, to prevent, identify and respond to risks to school safety, and to intervene immediately and responsibly should incidents of violence occur.
Safe school strategies range from establishing youth courts and mentoring programs to incorporating conflict resolution education into school programming to enhancing building safety, hiring school resource officers, establishing or expanding before and after-school programming and adopting policies and procedures that are consistent, clear, and developed collaboratively by the school community.
The National Resource Center for Safe Schools is operated by the Northwest Regional Educational Laboratory and was established with funding from the U.S. Department of Education's Safe and Drug-Free Schools Program and the U.S. Department of Justice's Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention.
Ham il to n F is h Na ti ona l I nsit u te o n Sc hool and Co mm uni ty V iolence
www.interact.uoregon.edu/ivdb/ivdb.html The Institute's mission is to empower schools and social service agencies to address violence and destructive behavior at the point of school entry and beyond, to ensure safety and facilitate the academic achievement and healthy social development of children and youth.
This is a combination of community, campus, and State efforts to research violence and destructive behavior among children and youth.
Th e N at i onal L on gi tu din a l Stu dy of A do l es ce nt H eal t h ( Ad d H e alt h )
www.hamfish.org The Institute, with assistance from OJJDP, was founded in 1997 to serve as a national resource to test the effectiveness of school violence prevention methods and to develop more effective strategies.
The Institute's goal is to determine what works and what can be replicated to reduce violence in America's schools and their immediate communities.
The Institute works with a consortium of seven universities whose key staff have expertise in adolescent violence, criminology, law enforcement, substance abuse, juvenile justice, gangs, public health, education, behavior disorders, social skills development and prevention programs.
The George Washington University develops and tests violence prevention strategies in collaboration with the following universities: Florida State University, Morehouse School of Medicine, Syracuse University, Eastern Kentucky University, University of Oregon, and University of WisconsinMilwaukee.
58 1999 AN NUAL REPORT ON SCHO OL S AFETY
www.cpc.unc.edu/projects/addhealth/addhealth_home.html Add Health is a school-based study of the health-related behaviors of adolescents in grades 7-12.
It has been designed to explore the causes of these behaviors, with an emphasis on the influence of social context.
Add Health postulates that families, friends, schools, and communities play roles in the lives of adolescents that may encourage healthy choices of activities or may lead to unhealthy, selfdestructive behaviors.
La w -R el ate d E du ca t ion
www.abanet.org/publiced/youth/youth.html Law-related education (LRE) teaches elementary and secondary students about the foundations of our constitutional republic and their responsibilities and rights as citizens.
Through law-related education, students
Putman Valley Middle School Putman Valley, New York Middle School, Grades 6-8 550 students Town S cho ol S af e t y F o cus :
Social Skills and Competence Training for All Students Bully Prevention Programs Harassment Prevention Training Mentoring Program Co n tac t I nf or m a t i o n :
Marjorie Holder man, Principal Putnam Valley Middle School 142 Peekskill Hollow Road Putnam Valley, NY (914) 528-8101 (phone) (914) 528-8145 (fax) pv.k12.ny.us
Although Putnam County has the lowest crime rate in New York State, the district's needs assessment indicated that student drug and alcohol use had increased in grades 68, with use primarily occurring on the weekends in the children's homes or homes of their friends.
With the assistance of a community/school Health Advisory Council, a set of program priorities and objectives were developed to respond quickly to this disturbing trend.
Putnam Valley Middle School has drawn upon evidence indicating that strong family/school learning and child development partnerships can reduce problem behaviors, such as alcohol and drug use.
Putnam's comprehensive social competence and health education approach is designed to promote student self-worth, positive health behaviors, social skill, and positive relationships, motivation to behave responsibly, and skills for work.
The cultivation of these values and behaviors is present in every aspect of school life--including core curriculum and counseling sessions.
For example, ever y day begins with lessons in conflict resolution, domestic violence, and harassment, with a group of 12-14 students across grade levels.
Peer mediation is also available at all grade levels.
Parental involvement is an integral part of the planning and services available to students at Putnam Valley.
Parents are involved in shared decision making on the School Improvement Team and the Steering Committee.
More important, parents serve an essential function as resource advisors, and planners on the Health Advisor y Council, which sponsors numerous parent and parent/child evening activities throughout the year.
Through the Parent Alert and Family Wellness, and "Straight Talk" programs, Putnam has created opportunities for families to network and learn more about creating healthy relationships and substance abuse prevention.
Since the implementation of these programs, parental involvement has increased substantially.
Since 1996, participation in the Parent Alert program has increased from 20 parents to approximately 150 parents, teachers, and students.
Evaluation data collected since implementing the comprehensive prevention program indicate that the number of principal referrals have decreased substantially, from 103 in the 1996-97 school year to 61 in 1997-98.
The number of incidents reported to police also decreased from three incidents in 1996-97 to zero incidents in the last two years.
According to clinical staff, the number of reports about drug and alcohol use and incidents in school have also decreased since 1993, with zero alcohol or drug incidents since 1996.
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT ON
SCHOOL
SAFET Y
59
develop unique insights that promote social responsibility, reaffirm the fundamental values of right and wrong, and inspire a commitment to good citizenship.
LRE programs which have been demonstrated to be effective, can be integrated into existing courses (e.g., government, civics, and history), offered as electives (e.g., high school practical law course), used as the focus of a special event (e.g., mock trial competition, mock congressional hearings, mock mediations, etc.), and/or used as components of an after-school program.
Specialized LRE programs have been developed and tested with the highest at-risk groups of youth including gang members, teen parents, and youth already in the juvenile justice system.
LRE programs exist at the local (school), statewide, and national level.
These programs recognize the need for partnerships with law enforcement, the bar, the bench, and others.
Na ti ona l S ch o ol S a fe ty Ce nte r
Sc hoo l Me nt al H ea lth P roj ec t/ Ce nte r for M e nta l H eal t h i n Sc hoo ls ( UC LA)
www.smhp.psych.ucla.edu The Center's mission is to improve outcomes for youth by enhancing policies, programs, and practices relevant to mental health in schools, with specific attention to strategies that can counter fragmentation and enhance collaboration between school and community programs.
REFERENCES
www.nssc1.org The National School Safety Center (NSSC) was created by presidential directive in 1984 to meet the growing need for additional training and preparation in school crime and violence prevention.
Affiliated with Pepperdine University, NSSC is a nonprofit organization whose charge is to promote safe schools--free of crime and violence--and to help ensure quality education for all America's children.
N ati o nal Youth G ang Ce nte r
For specific information about the studies used for this report, please see Indicators of School Crime and Safety, 1999, by P. Kaufman, X. Chen, S. P. Choy, K. A. Chandler, C. D. Chapman, M. R. Rand, and C. Ringel.
U.S. Departments of Education and Justice.
NCES 99251/NCJ-172215.
Washington, DC: 1998.
Indicators of School Crime and Safety, 1999 can be downloaded from the World Wide Web at http://nces.ed.gov or http://www.ojp.usdoj.gov/bjs/.
Single hard copies can be ordered through ED Pubs at 1-8004ED-PUBS (NCES 99-251) (TTY/TDD 1-877-576-7734), and the Bureau of Justice Statistics Clearinghouse at 1-800732-3277 (NCJ-172215).
Da ta s our ce s f or thi s repor t in cl ud e:
www.iir.com/nygc The purpose of the National Youth Gang Center (NYGC) is to expand and maintain the body of critical knowledge about youth gangs and effective responses to them.
The NYGC assists State and local jurisdictions in the collection, analysis, and exchange of information on gang-related demographics, legislation, literature, research, and promising program strategies.
It also coordinates activities of OJJDP Youth Gang Consortium, a group of Federal agencies, gang program representatives, and service providers.
Par tne rs hi ps Ag a in st V i ole nc e N et work
Monitoring the Future: A Continuing Study of American Youth, University of Michigan's Institute for Social Research.
This is an ongoing survey conducted to study changes in important values, behaviors and lifestyle orientations of American youth.
Since 1975, the study has surveyed a large, representative sample of U.S. high school seniors.
Survey topics include attitudes toward education, social problems, occupational aims, marital and family plans, and deviant behavior and victimization.
National Crime Victimization Survey, Bureau of Justice Statistics.
Administered for the Bureau of Justice Statistics by the Bureau of the Census, this is the nation's primary source of information on crime victimization and victims of crime.
The study was initiated in 1972 and redesigned in 1992, and collects detailed information on the nature and frequency of the crimes of rape, sexual assault, robbery, aggravated and simple assault, theft, household burglary, and motor vehicle theft experienced by Americans and their households each year.
The survey measures crimes reported as well as those not reported to police.
www.pavnet.org PAVNET Online is a virtual library of information about violence and youth-at-risk, representing data from seven different Federal agencies.
It is a one-stop, searchable, information resource to help reduce redundancy in information management and provide clear and comprehensive access to information for States and local communities.
60
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCHOOL SAFETY
National School-Based Youth Risk Behavior Surveillance System (YRBSS), Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
This study is one component of the larger Youth Risk Behavior Surveillance System, and epidemiological surveillance system developed by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention to monitor youth behaviors that most influence health.
The YRBSS focuses on behaviors that result in significant mortality, morbidity, disability and social problems during both youth and adulthood.
The report uses 1993, 1995, and 1997 YRBSS data.
For more information contact the Division of Adolescent and School Health at (770) 488-3259.
The School-Associated Violent Deaths Study, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the U.S. Department of Education.
This study is nearing completion and has collected descriptive data on all school-associated violent deaths in the United States.
The study period is from July 1, 1994 to June 30, 1998.
The purpose of the study is to estimate the level of risk for schoolassociated violent deaths and to identify potential risk factors for these deaths.
Third International Mathematics and Science Study (TIMSS), National Center for Education Statistics, National Science Foundation, and the Government of Canada.
This study collects assessment data from students, as well as descriptive data from students, teachers, and schools.
The study, conducted in 1995, consists of data on a half a million students in 41 countries.
For more information on TIMSS, call the TIMSS customer service line at (202) 219-1333.
The WHO Study of Health Behaviour in School-Aged Children, U.S. National Institute of Child Health and Human Development (NICHD), Bethesda, MD.
This school-based research study, performed for the first time in the United States in 1997-98, has been conducted every four years by European countries
since 1982.
The research goal is to increase ing of health behaviors, lifestyles, and their context in young people, ages 11-15 years.
provides data on 120,000 students from 28 tries for the 1997-98 school year.
For more contact NICHD at (301) 496-5133.
our understandThe study couninformation
The FBI's Uniform Crime Reports: Hate Crime Statistics.
This publication can be ordered by telephone or by mail by contacting: Federal Bureau of Investigation, Criminal Justice Information Services Division, Programs Support Section, 1000 Custer Hollow Road, Clarksburg, WV 26306, or call (304) 625-4995.
National Assessment of Educational Progress, National Center for Educational Statistics.
The National Assessment of Educational Progress is the only nationally representative and continuing assessment of what America's students know and can do in various subject areas.
Since 1969, assessments have been conducted periodically in reading, mathematics, science, writing, history, geography, the arts, and other fields.
For more information, contact the National Center for Educational Statistics, 555 New Jersey Avenue, NW, Washington, DC 20208-5574, or call (202) 219-1828.
199 9
AN NUA L
REP ORT
ON
SCH OOL
SAFETY
61
nn al u report
